A.L.R. These are the symbols (or Verses) of the perspicuous Book.
We have sent it down as an Arabic Qur'an, in order that ye may learn wisdom.
We do relate unto thee the most beautiful of stories, in that We reveal to thee this (portion of the) Qur'an: before this, thou too was among those who knew it not.
Behold! Joseph said to his father: "O my father! I did see eleven stars and the sun and the moon: I saw them prostrate themselves to me!"
Said (the father): "My (dear) little son! relate not thy vision to thy brothers, lest they concoct a plot against thee: for Satan is to man an avowed enemy!
"Thus will thy Lord choose thee and teach thee the interpretation of stories (and events) and perfect His favour to thee and to the posterity of Jacob - even as He perfected it to thy fathers Abraham and Isaac aforetime! for God is full of knowledge and wisdom."
Verily in Joseph and his brethren are signs (or symbols) for seekers (after Truth).
They said: "Truly Joseph and his brother are loved more by our father than we: But we are a goodly body! really our father is obviously wandering (in his mind)!
"Slay ye Joseph or cast him out to some (unknown) land, that so the favour of your father may be given to you alone: (there will be time enough) for you to be righteous after that!"
Said one of them: "Slay not Joseph, but if ye must do something, throw him down to the bottom of the well: he will be picked up by some caravan of travellers."
They said: "O our father! why dost thou not trust us with Joseph,- seeing we are indeed his sincere well-wishers?
"Send him with us tomorrow to enjoy himself and play, and we shall take every care of him."
(Jacob) said: "Really it saddens me that ye should take him away: I fear lest the wolf should devour him while ye attend not to him."
They said: "If the wolf were to devour him while we are (so large) a party, then should we indeed (first) have perished ourselves!"
So they did take him away, and they all agreed to throw him down to the bottom of the well: and We put into his heart (this Message): 'Of a surety thou shalt (one day) tell them the truth of this their affair while they know (thee) not'
Then they came to their father in the early part of the night, weeping.
They said: "O our father! We went racing with one another, and left Joseph with our things; and the wolf devoured him.... But thou wilt never believe us even though we tell the truth."
They stained his shirt with false blood. He said: "Nay, but your minds have made up a tale (that may pass) with you, (for me) patience is most fitting: Against that which ye assert, it is God (alone) Whose help can be sought"..
Then there came a caravan of travellers: they sent their water-carrier (for water), and he let down his bucket (into the well)...He said: "Ah there! Good news! Here is a (fine) young man!" So they concealed him as a treasure! But God knoweth well all that they do!
The (Brethren) sold him for a miserable price, for a few dirhams counted out: in such low estimation did they hold him!
The man in Egypt who bought him, said to his wife: "Make his stay (among us) honourable: may be he will bring us much good, or we shall adopt him as a son." Thus did We establish Joseph in the land, that We might teach him the interpretation of stories (and events). And God hath full power and control over His affairs; but most among mankind know it not.
When Joseph attained His full manhood, We gave him power and knowledge: thus do We reward those who do right.
But she in whose house he was, sought to seduce him from his (true) self: she fastened the doors, and said: "Now come, thou (dear one)!" He said: "God forbid! truly (thy husband) is my lord! he made my sojourn agreeable! truly to no good come those who do wrong!"
And (with passion) did she desire him, and he would have desired her, but that he saw the evidence of his Lord: thus (did We order) that We might turn away from him (all) evil and shameful deeds: for he was one of Our servants, sincere and purified.
So they both raced each other to the door, and she tore his shirt from the back: they both found her lord near the door. She said: "What is the (fitting) punishment for one who formed an evil design against thy wife, but prison or a grievous chastisement?"
He said: "It was she that sought to seduce me - from my (true) self." And one of her household saw (this) and bore witness, (thus):- "If it be that his shirt is rent from the front, then is her tale true, and he is a liar!
"But if it be that his shirt is torn from the back, then is she the liar, and he is telling the truth!"
So when he saw his shirt,- that it was torn at the back,- (her husband) said: "Behold! It is a snare of you women! truly, mighty is your snare!
"O Joseph, pass this over! (O wife), ask forgiveness for thy sin, for truly thou hast been at fault!"
Ladies said in the City: "The wife of the (great) 'Aziz is seeking to seduce her slave from his (true) self: Truly hath he inspired her with violent love: we see she is evidently going astray."
When she heard of their malicious talk, she sent for them and prepared a banquet for them: she gave each of them a knife: and she said (to Joseph), "Come out before them." When they saw him, they did extol him, and (in their amazement) cut their hands: they said, "God preserve us! no mortal is this! this is none other than a noble angel!"
She said: "There before you is the man about whom ye did blame me! I did seek to seduce him from his (true) self but he did firmly save himself guiltless!....and now, if he doth not my bidding, he shall certainly be cast into prison, and (what is more) be of the company of the vilest!"
He said: "O my Lord! the prison is more to my liking than that to which they invite me: Unless Thou turn away their snare from me, I should (in my youthful folly) feel inclined towards them and join the ranks of the ignorant."
So his Lord hearkened to him (in his prayer), and turned away from him their snare: Verily He heareth and knoweth (all things).
Then it occurred to the men, after they had seen the signs, (that it was best) to imprison him for a time.
Now with him there came into the prison two young men. Said one of them: "I see myself (in a dream) pressing wine." said the other: "I see myself (in a dream) carrying bread on my head, and birds are eating, thereof." "Tell us" (they said) "The truth and meaning thereof: for we see thou art one that doth good (to all)."
He said: "Before any food comes (in due course) to feed either of you, I will surely reveal to you the truth and meaning of this ere it befall you: that is part of the (duty) which my Lord hath taught me. I have (I assure you) abandoned the ways of a people that believe not in God and that (even) deny the Hereafter.
"And I follow the ways of my fathers,- Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; and never could we attribute any partners whatever to God: that (comes) of the grace of God to us and to mankind: yet most men are not grateful.
"O my two companions of the prison! (I ask you): are many lords differing among themselves better, or the One God, Supreme and Irresistible?
"If not Him, ye worship nothing but names which ye have named,- ye and your fathers,- for which God hath sent down no authority: the command is for none but God: He hath commanded that ye worship none but Him: that is the right religion, but most men understand not...
"O my two companions of the prison! As to one of you, he will pour out the wine for his lord to drink: as for the other, he will hang from the cross, and the birds will eat from off his head. (so) hath been decreed that matter whereof ye twain do enquire"...
And of the two, to that one whom he consider about to be saved, he said: "Mention me to thy lord." But Satan made him forget to mention him to his lord: and (Joseph) lingered in prison a few (more) years.
The king (of Egypt) said: "I do see (in a vision) seven fat kine, whom seven lean ones devour, and seven green ears of corn, and seven (others) withered. O ye chiefs! Expound to me my vision if it be that ye can interpret visions."
They said: "A confused medley of dreams: and we are not skilled in the interpretation of dreams."
But the man who had been released, one of the two (who had been in prison) and who now bethought him after (so long) a space of time, said: "I will tell you the truth of its interpretation: send ye me (therefore)."
"O Joseph!" (he said) "O man of truth! Expound to us (the dream) of seven fat kine whom seven lean ones devour, and of seven green ears of corn and (seven) others withered: that I may return to the people, and that they may understand."
(Joseph) said: "For seven years shall ye diligently sow as is your wont: and the harvests that ye reap, ye shall leave them in the ear,- except a little, of which ye shall eat.
"Then will come after that (period) seven dreadful (years), which will devour what ye shall have laid by in advance for them,- (all) except a little which ye shall have (specially) guarded.
"Then will come after that (period) a year in which the people will have abundant water, and in which they will press (wine and oil)."
So the king said: "Bring ye him unto me." But when the messenger came to him, (Joseph) said: "Go thou back to thy lord, and ask him, 'What is the state of mind of the ladies who cut their hands'? For my Lord is certainly well aware of their snare."
(The king) said (to the ladies): "What was your affair when ye did seek to seduce Joseph from his (true) self?" The ladies said: "God preserve us! no evil know we against him!" Said the 'Aziz's wife: "Now is the truth manifest (to all): it was I who sought to seduce him from his (true) self: He is indeed of those who are (ever) true (and virtuous).
"This (say I), in order that He may know that I have never been false to him in his absence, and that God will never guide the snare of the false ones.
"Nor do I absolve my own self (of blame): the (human) soul is certainly prone to evil, unless my Lord do bestow His Mercy: but surely my Lord is Oft- forgiving, Most Merciful."
So the king said: "Bring him unto me; I will take him specially to serve about my own person." Therefore when he had spoken to him, he said: "Be assured this day, thou art, before our own presence, with rank firmly established, and fidelity fully proved!
(Joseph) said: "Set me over the store-houses of the land: I will indeed guard them, as one that knows (their importance)."
Thus did We give established power to Joseph in the land, to take possession therein as, when, or where he pleased. We bestow of our Mercy on whom We please, and We suffer not, to be lost, the reward of those who do good.
But verily the reward of the Hereafter is the best, for those who believe, and are constant in righteousness.
Then came Joseph's brethren: they entered his presence, and he knew them, but they knew him not.
And when he had furnished them forth with provisions (suitable) for them, he said: "Bring unto me a brother ye have, of the same father as yourselves, (but a different mother): see ye not that I pay out full measure, and that I do provide the best hospitality?
"Now if ye bring him not to me, ye shall have no measure (of corn) from me, nor shall ye (even) come near me."
They said: "We shall certainly seek to get our wish about him from his father: Indeed we shall do it."
And (Joseph) told his servants to put their stock-in-trade (with which they had bartered) into their saddle-bags, so they should know it only when they returned to their people, in order that they might come back.
Now when they returned to their father, they said: "O our father! No more measure of grain shall we get (unless we take our brother): So send our brother with us, that we may get our measure; and we will indeed take every care of him."
He said: "Shall I trust you with him with any result other than when I trusted you with his brother aforetime? But God is the best to take care (of him), and He is the Most Merciful of those who show mercy!"
Then when they opened their baggage, they found their stock-in-trade had been returned to them. They said: "O our father! What (more) can we desire? this our stock-in-trade has been returned to us: so we shall get (more) food for our family; We shall take care of our brother; and add (at the same time) a full camel's load (of grain to our provisions). This is but a small quantity.
(Jacob) said: "Never will I send him with you until ye swear a solemn oath to me, in God's name, that ye will be sure to bring him back to me unless ye are yourselves hemmed in (and made powerless). And when they had sworn their solemn oath, he said: "Over all that we say, be God the witness and guardian!"
Further he said: "O my sons! enter not all by one gate: enter ye by different gates. Not that I can profit you aught against God (with my advice): None can command except God: On Him do I put my trust: and let all that trust put their trust on Him."
And when they entered in the manner their father had enjoined, it did not profit them in the least against (the plan of) God: It was but a necessity of Jacob's soul, which he discharged. For he was, by our instruction, full of knowledge (and experience): but most men know not.
Now when they came into Joseph's presence, he received his (full) brother to stay with him. He said (to him): "Behold! I am thy (own) brother; so grieve not at aught of their doings."
At length when he had furnished them forth with provisions (suitable) for them, he put the drinking cup into his brother's saddle-bag. Then shouted out a crier: "O ye (in) the caravan! behold! ye are thieves, without doubt!"
They said, turning towards them: "What is it that ye miss?"
They said: "We miss the great beaker of the king; for him who produces it, is (the reward of) a camel load; I will be bound by it."
(The brothers) said: "By God! well ye know that we came not to make mischief in the land, and we are no thieves!"
(The Egyptians) said: "What then shall be the penalty of this, if ye are (proved) to have lied?"
They said: "The penalty should be that he in whose saddle-bag it is found, should be held (as bondman) to atone for the (crime). Thus it is we punish the wrong- doers!"
So he began (the search) with their baggage, before (he came to) the baggage of his brother: at length he brought it out of his brother's baggage. Thus did We plan for Joseph. He could not take his brother by the law of the king except that God willed it (so). We raise to degrees (of wisdom) whom We please: but over all endued with knowledge is one, the All-Knowing.
They said: "If he steals, there was a brother of his who did steal before (him)." But these things did Joseph keep locked in his heart, revealing not the secrets to them. He (simply) said (to himself): "Ye are the worse situated; and God knoweth best the truth of what ye assert!"
They said: "O exalted one! Behold! he has a father, aged and venerable, (who will grieve for him); so take one of us in his place; for we see that thou art (gracious) in doing good."
He said: "God forbid that we take other than him with whom we found our property: indeed (if we did so), we should be acting wrongfully.
Now when they saw no hope of his (yielding), they held a conference in private. The leader among them said: "Know ye not that your father did take an oath from you in God's name, and how, before this, ye did fail in your duty with Joseph? Therefore will I not leave this land until my father permits me, or God commands me; and He is the best to command.
"Turn ye back to your father, and say, 'O our father! behold! thy son committed theft! we bear witness only to what we know, and we could not well guard against the unseen!
"'Ask at the town where we have been and the caravan in which we returned, and (you will find) we are indeed telling the truth.'"
Jacob said: "Nay, but ye have yourselves contrived a story (good enough) for you. So patience is most fitting (for me). Maybe God will bring them (back) all to me (in the end). For He is indeed full of knowledge and wisdom."
And he turned away from them, and said: "How great is my grief for Joseph!" And his eyes became white with sorrow, and he fell into silent melancholy.
They said: "By God! (never) wilt thou cease to remember Joseph until thou reach the last extremity of illness, or until thou die!"
He said: "I only complain of my distraction and anguish to God, and I know from God that which ye know not...
"O my sons! go ye and enquire about Joseph and his brother, and never give up hope of God's Soothing Mercy: truly no one despairs of God's Soothing Mercy, except those who have no faith."
Then, when they came (back) into (Joseph's) presence they said: "O exalted one! distress has seized us and our family: we have (now) brought but scanty capital: so pay us full measure, (we pray thee), and treat it as charity to us: for God doth reward the charitable."
He said: "Know ye how ye dealt with Joseph and his brother, not knowing (what ye were doing)?"
They said: "Art thou indeed Joseph?" He said, "I am Joseph, and this is my brother: God has indeed been gracious to us (all): behold, he that is righteous and patient,- never will God suffer the reward to be lost, of those who do right."
They said: "By God! indeed has God preferred thee above us, and we certainly have been guilty of sin!"
He said: "This day let no reproach be (cast) on you: God will forgive you, and He is the Most Merciful of those who show mercy!
"Go with this my shirt, and cast it over the face of my father: he will come to see (clearly). Then come ye (here) to me together with all your family."
When the caravan left (Egypt), their father said: "I do indeed scent the presence of Joseph: Nay, think me not a dotard."
They said: "By God! truly thou art in thine old wandering mind."
Then when the bearer of the good news came, He cast (the shirt) over his face, and he forthwith regained clear sight. He said: "Did I not say to you, 'I know from God that which ye know not?'"
They said: "O our father! ask for us forgiveness for our sins, for we were truly at fault."
He said: "Soon will I ask my Lord for forgiveness for you: for he is indeed Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful."
Then when they entered the presence of Joseph, he provided a home for his parents with himself, and said: "Enter ye Egypt (all) in safety if it please God."
And he raised his parents high on the throne (of dignity), and they fell down in prostration, (all) before him. He said: "O my father! this is the fulfilment of my vision of old! God hath made it come true! He was indeed good to me when He took me out of prison and brought you (all here) out of the desert, (even) after Satan had sown enmity between me and my brothers. Verily my Lord understandeth best the mysteries of all that He planneth to do, for verily He is full of knowledge and wisdom.
"O my Lord! Thou hast indeed bestowed on me some power, and taught me something of the interpretation of dreams and events,- O Thou Creator of the heavens and the earth! Thou art my Protector in this world and in the Hereafter. Take Thou my soul (at death) as one submitting to Thy will (as a Muslim), and unite me with the righteous."
Such is one of the stories of what happened unseen, which We reveal by inspiration unto thee; nor wast thou (present) with them then when they concerted their plans together in the process of weaving their plots.
Yet no faith will the greater part of mankind have, however ardently thou dost desire it.
And no reward dost thou ask of them for this: it is no less than a message for all creatures.
And how many Signs in the heavens and the earth do they pass by? Yet they turn (their faces) away from them!
And most of them believe not in God without associating (other as partners) with Him!
Do they then feel secure from the coming against them of the covering veil of the wrath of God,- or of the coming against them of the (final) Hour all of a sudden while they perceive not?
Say thou: "This is my way: I do invite unto God,- on evidence clear as the seeing with one's eyes,- I and whoever follows me. Glory to God! and never will I join gods with God!"
Nor did We send before thee (as apostles) any but men, whom we did inspire,- (men) living in human habitations. Do they not travel through the earth, and see what was the end of those before them? But the home of the hereafter is best, for those who do right. Will ye not then understand?
(Respite will be granted) until, when the apostles give up hope (of their people) and (come to) think that they were treated as liars, there reaches them Our help, and those whom We will are delivered into safety. But never will be warded off our punishment from those who are in sin.
There is, in their stories, instruction for men endued with understanding. It is not a tale invented, but a confirmation of what went before it,- a detailed exposition of all things, and a guide and a mercy to any such as believe.
A.L.M.R. These are the signs (or verses) of the Book: that which hath been revealed unto thee from thy Lord is the Truth; but most men believe not.
God is He Who raised the heavens without any pillars that ye can see; is firmly established on the throne (of authority); He has subjected the sun and the moon (to his Law)! Each one runs (its course) for a term appointed. He doth regulate all affairs, explaining the signs in detail, that ye may believe with certainty in the meeting with your Lord.
And it is He who spread out the earth, and set thereon mountains standing firm and (flowing) rivers: and fruit of every kind He made in pairs, two and two: He draweth the night as a veil o'er the Day. Behold, verily in these things there are signs for those who consider!
And in the earth are tracts (diverse though) neighbouring, and gardens of vines and fields sown with corn, and palm trees - growing out of single roots or otherwise: watered with the same water, yet some of them We make more excellent than others to eat. Behold, verily in these things there are signs for those who understand!
If thou dost marvel (at their want of faith), strange is their saying: "When we are (actually) dust, shall we indeed then be in a creation renewed?" They are those who deny their Lord! They are those round whose necks will be yokes (of servitude): they will be Companions of the Fire, to dwell therein (for aye)!
They ask thee to hasten on the evil in preference to the good: Yet have come to pass, before them, (many) exemplary punishments! But verily thy Lord is full of forgiveness for mankind for their wrong-doing, and verily thy Lord is (also) strict in punishment.
And the Unbelievers say: "Why is not a sign sent down to him from his Lord?" But thou art truly a warner, and to every people a guide.
God doth know what every female (womb) doth bear, by how much the wombs fall short (of their time or number) or do exceed. Every single thing is before His sight, in (due) proportion.
He knoweth the unseen and that which is open: He is the Great, the Most High.
It is the same (to Him) whether any of you conceal his speech or declare it openly; whether he lie hid by night or walk forth freely by day.
For each (such person) there are (angels) in succession, before and behind him: They guard him by command of God. Verily never will God change the condition of a people until they change it themselves (with their own souls). But when (once) God willeth a people's punishment, there can be no turning it back, nor will they find, besides Him, any to protect.
It is He Who doth show you the lightning, by way both of fear and of hope: It is He Who doth raise up the clouds, heavy with (fertilising) rain!
Nay, thunder repeateth His praises, and so do the angels, with awe: He flingeth the loud-voiced thunder-bolts, and therewith He striketh whomsoever He will..yet these (are the men) who (dare to) dispute about God, with the strength of His power (supreme)!
For Him (alone) is prayer in Truth: any others that they call upon besides Him hear them no more than if they were to stretch forth their hands for water to reach their mouths but it reaches them not: for the prayer of those without Faith is nothing but (futile) wandering (in the mind).
Whatever beings there are in the heavens and the earth do prostrate themselves to God (Acknowledging subjection),- with good-will or in spite of themselves: so do their shadows in the morning and evenings.
Say: "Who is the Lord and Sustainer of the heavens and the earth?" Say: "(It is) God." Say: "Do ye then take (for worship) protectors other than Him, such as have no power either for good or for harm to themselves?" Say: "Are the blind equal with those who see? Or the depths of darkness equal with light?" Or do they assign to God partners who have created (anything) as He has created, so that the creation seemed to them similar? Say: "God is the Creator of all things: He is the One, the Supreme and Irresistible."
He sends down water from the skies, and the channels flow, each according to its measure: But the torrent bears away to foam that mounts up to the surface. Even so, from that (ore) which they heat in the fire, to make ornaments or utensils therewith, there is a scum likewise. Thus doth God (by parables) show forth Truth and Vanity. For the scum disappears like forth cast out; while that which is for the good of mankind remains on the earth. Thus doth God set forth parables.
For those who respond to their Lord, are (all) good things. But those who respond not to Him,- Even if they had all that is in the heavens and on earth, and as much more, (in vain) would they offer it for ransom. For them will the reckoning be terrible: their abode will be Hell,- what a bed of misery!
Is then one who doth know that that which hath been revealed unto thee from thy Lord is the Truth, like one who is blind? It is those who are endued with understanding that receive admonition;-
Those who fulfil the covenant of God and fail not in their plighted word;
Those who join together those things which God hath commanded to be joined, hold their Lord in awe, and fear the terrible reckoning;
Those who patiently persevere, seeking the countenance of their Lord; Establish regular prayers; spend, out of (the gifts) We have bestowed for their sustenance, secretly and openly; and turn off Evil with good: for such there is the final attainment of the (eternal) home,-
Gardens of perpetual bliss: they shall enter there, as well as the righteous among their fathers, their spouses, and their offspring: and angels shall enter unto them from every gate (with the salutation):
"Peace unto you for that ye persevered in patience! Now how excellent is the final home!"
But those who break the Covenant of God, after having plighted their word thereto, and cut asunder those things which God has commanded to be joined, and work mischief in the land;- on them is the curse; for them is the terrible home!
God doth enlarge, or grant by (strict) measure, the sustenance (which He giveth) to whomso He pleaseth. (The wordly) rejoice in the life of this world: But the life of this world is but little comfort in the Hereafter.
The Unbelievers say: "Why is not a sign sent down to him from his Lord?" Say: "Truly God leaveth, to stray, whom He will; But He guideth to Himself those who turn to Him in penitence,-
"Those who believe, and whose hearts find satisfaction in the remembrance of God: for without doubt in the remembrance of God do hearts find satisfaction.
"For those who believe and work righteousness, is (every) blessedness, and a beautiful place of (final) return."
Thus have we sent thee amongst a People before whom (long since) have (other) Peoples (gone and) passed away; in order that thou mightest rehearse unto them what We send down unto thee by inspiration; yet do they reject (Him), the Most Gracious! Say: "He is my Lord! There is no god but He! On Him is my trust, and to Him do I turn!"
If there were a Qur'an with which mountains were moved, or the earth were cloven asunder, or the dead were made to speak, (this would be the one!) But, truly, the command is with God in all things! Do not the Believers know, that, had God (so) willed, He could have guided all mankind (to the right)? But the Unbelievers,- never will disaster cease to seize them for their (ill) deeds, or to settle close to their homes, until the promise of God come to pass, for, verily, God will not fail in His promise.
Mocked were (many) apostles before thee: but I granted respite to the unbelievers, and finally I punished them: Then how (terrible) was my requital!
Is then He who standeth over every soul (and knoweth) all that it doth, (like any others)? And yet they ascribe partners to God. Say: "But name them! is it that ye will inform Him of something he knoweth not on earth, or is it (just) a show of words?" Nay! to those who believe not, their pretence seems pleasing, but they are kept back (thereby) from the path. And those whom God leaves to stray, no one can guide.
For them is a penalty in the life of this world, but harder, truly, is the penalty of the Hereafter: and defender have they none against God.
The parable of the Garden which the righteous are promised!- beneath it flow rivers: perpetual is the enjoyment thereof and the shade therein: such is the end of the Righteous; and the end of Unbelievers in the Fire.
Those to whom We have given the Book rejoice at what hath been revealed unto thee: but there are among the clans those who reject a part thereof. Say: "I am commanded to worship God, and not to join partners with Him. Unto Him do I call, and unto Him is my return."
Thus have We revealed it to be a judgment of authority in Arabic. Wert thou to follow their (vain) desires after the knowledge which hath reached thee, then wouldst thou find neither protector nor defender against God.
We did send apostles before thee, and appointed for them wives and children: and it was never the part of an apostle to bring a sign except as God permitted (or commanded). For each period is a Book (revealed).
God doth blot out or confirm what He pleaseth: with Him is the Mother of the Book.
Whether We shall show thee (within thy life-time) part of what we promised them or take to ourselves thy soul (before it is all accomplished),- thy duty is to make (the Message) reach them: it is our part to call them to account.
See they not that We gradually reduce the land (in their control) from its outlying borders? (Where) God commands, there is none to put back His Command: and He is swift in calling to account.
Those before them did (also) devise plots; but in all things the master- planning is God's He knoweth the doings of every soul: and soon will the Unbelievers know who gets home in the end.
The Unbelievers say: "No apostle art thou." Say: "Enough for a witness between me and you is God, and such as have knowledge of the Book."
A. L. R. A Book which We have revealed unto thee, in order that thou mightest lead mankind out of the depths of darkness into light - by the leave of their Lord - to the Way of (Him) the Exalted in power, worthy of all praise!-
Of God, to Whom do belong all things in the heavens and on earth! But alas for the Unbelievers for a terrible penalty (their Unfaith will bring them)!-
Those who love the life of this world more than the Hereafter, who hinder (men) from the Path of God and seek therein something crooked: they are astray by a long distance.
We sent not an apostle except (to teach) in the language of his (own) people, in order to make (things) clear to them. Now God leaves straying those whom He pleases and guides whom He pleases: and He is Exalted in power, full of Wisdom.
We sent Moses with Our signs (and the command). "Bring out thy people from the depths of darkness into light, and teach them to remember the Days of God." Verily in this there are Signs for such as are firmly patient and constant,- grateful and appreciative.
Remember! Moses said to his people: "Call to mind the favour of God to you when He delivered you from the people of Pharaoh: they set you hard tasks and punishments, slaughtered your sons, and let your women-folk live: therein was a tremendous trial from your Lord."
And remember! your Lord caused to be declared (publicly): "If ye are grateful, I will add more (favours) unto you; But if ye show ingratitude, truly My punishment is terrible indeed."
And Moses said: "If ye show ingratitude, ye and all on earth together, yet is God free of all wants, worthy of all praise.
Has not the story reached you, (O people!), of those who (went) before you? - of the people of Noah, and 'Ad, and Thamud? - And of those who (came) after them? None knows them but God. To them came apostles with Clear (Signs); but they put their hands up to their mouths, and said: "We do deny (the mission) on which ye have been sent, and we are really in suspicious (disquieting) doubt as to that to which ye invite us."
Their apostles said: "Is there a doubt about God, The Creator of the heavens and the earth? It is He Who invites you, in order that He may forgive you your sins and give you respite for a term appointed!" They said: "Ah! ye are no more than human, like ourselves! Ye wish to turn us away from the (gods) our fathers used to worship: then bring us some clear authority."
Their apostles said to them: "True, we are human like yourselves, but God doth grant His grace to such of his servants as He pleases. It is not for us to bring you an authority except as God permits. And on God let all men of faith put their trust.
"No reason have we why we should not put our trust on God. Indeed He Has guided us to the Ways we (follow). We shall certainly bear with patience all the hurt you may cause us. For those who put their trust should put their trust on God."
And the Unbelievers said to their apostles: "Be sure we shall drive you out of our land, or ye shall return to our religion." But their Lord inspired (this Message) to them: "Verily We shall cause the wrong-doers to perish!
"And verily We shall cause you to abide in the land, and succeed them. This for such as fear the Time when they shall stand before My tribunal,- such as fear the punishment denounced."
But they sought victory and decision (there and then), and frustration was the lot of every powerful obstinate transgressor.
In front of such a one is Hell, and he is given, for drink, boiling fetid water.
In gulps will he sip it, but never will he be near swallowing it down his throat: death will come to him from every quarter, yet will he not die: and in front of him will be a chastisement unrelenting.
The parable of those who reject their Lord is that their works are as ashes, on which the wind blows furiously on a tempestuous day: No power have they over aught that they have earned: that is the straying far, far (from the goal).
Seest thou not that God created the heavens and the earth in Truth? If He so will, He can remove you and put (in your place) a new creation?
Nor is that for God any great matter.
They will all be marshalled before God together: then will the weak say to those who were arrogant, "For us, we but followed you; can ye then avail us to all against the wrath of God?" They will reply, "If we had received the Guidance of God, we should have given it to you: to us it makes no difference (now) whether we rage, or bear (these torments) with patience: for ourselves there is no way of escape."
And Satan will say when the matter is decided: "It was God Who gave you a promise of Truth: I too promised, but I failed in my promise to you. I had no authority over you except to call you but ye listened to me: then reproach not me, but reproach your own souls. I cannot listen to your cries, nor can ye listen to mine. I reject your former act in associating me with God. For wrong-doers there must be a grievous penalty."
But those who believe and work righteousness will be admitted to gardens beneath which rivers flow,- to dwell therein for aye with the leave of their Lord. Their greeting therein will be: "Peace!"
Seest thou not how God sets forth a parable? - A goodly word like a goodly tree, whose root is firmly fixed, and its branches (reach) to the heavens,- of its Lord. So God sets forth parables for men, in order that they may receive admonition.
It brings forth its fruit at all times, by the leave of its Lord. So God sets forth parables for men, in order that they may receive admonition.
And the parable of an evil Word is that of an evil tree: It is torn up by the root from the surface of the earth: it has no stability.
God will establish in strength those who believe, with the word that stands firm, in this world and in the Hereafter; but God will leave, to stray, those who do wrong: God doeth what He willeth.
Hast thou not turned thy vision to those who have changed the favour of God. Into blasphemy and caused their people to descend to the House of Perdition?-
Into Hell? They will burn therein,- an evil place to stay in!
And they set up (idols) as equal to God, to mislead (men) from the Path! Say: "Enjoy (your brief power)! But verily ye are making straightway for Hell!"
Speak to my servants who have believed, that they may establish regular prayers, and spend (in charity) out of the sustenance we have given them, secretly and openly, before the coming of a Day in which there will be neither mutual bargaining nor befriending.
It is God Who hath created the heavens and the earth and sendeth down rain from the skies, and with it bringeth out fruits wherewith to feed you; it is He Who hath made the ships subject to you, that they may sail through the sea by His command; and the rivers (also) hath He made subject to you.
And He hath made subject to you the sun and the moon, both diligently pursuing their courses; and the night and the day hath he (also) made subject to you.
And He giveth you of all that ye ask for. But if ye count the favours of God, never will ye be able to number them. Verily, man is given up to injustice and ingratitude.
Remember Abraham said: "O my Lord! make this city one of peace and security: and preserve me and my sons from worshipping idols.
"O my Lord! they have indeed led astray many among mankind; He then who follows my (ways) is of me, and he that disobeys me,- but Thou art indeed Oft- forgiving, Most Merciful.
"O our Lord! I have made some of my offspring to dwell in a valley without cultivation, by Thy Sacred House; in order, O our Lord, that they may establish regular Prayer: so fill the hearts of some among men with love towards them, and feed them with fruits: so that they may give thanks.
"O our Lord! truly Thou dost know what we conceal and what we reveal: for nothing whatever is hidden from God, whether on earth or in heaven.
"Praise be to God, Who hath granted unto me in old age Isma'il and Isaac: for truly my Lord is He, the Hearer of Prayer!
O my Lord! make me one who establishes regular Prayer, and also (raise such) among my offspring O our Lord! and accept Thou my Prayer.
"O our Lord! cover (us) with Thy Forgiveness - me, my parents, and (all) Believers, on the Day that the Reckoning will be established!
Think not that God doth not heed the deeds of those who do wrong. He but giveth them respite against a Day when the eyes will fixedly stare in horror,-
They running forward with necks outstretched, their heads uplifted, their gaze returning not towards them, and their hearts a (gaping) void!
So warn mankind of the Day when the Wrath will reach them: then will the wrong-doers say: "Our Lord! respite us (if only) for a short term: we will answer Thy call, and follow the apostles!" "What! were ye not wont to swear aforetime that ye should suffer no decline?
"And ye dwelt in the dwellings of men who wronged their own souls; ye were clearly shown how We dealt with them; and We put forth (many) parables in your behoof!"
Mighty indeed were the plots which they made, but their plots were (well) within the sight of God, even though they were such as to shake the hills!
Never think that God would fail his apostles in His promise: for God is Exalted in power, - the Lord of Retribution.
One day the earth will be changed to a different earth, and so will be the heavens, and (men) will be marshalled forth, before God, the One, the Irresistible;
And thou wilt see the sinners that day bound together in fetters;-
Their garments of liquid pitch, and their faces covered with Fire;
That God may requite each soul according to its deserts; and verily God is swift in calling to account.
Here is a Message for mankind: Let them take warning therefrom, and let them know that He is (no other than) One God: let men of understanding take heed.
A. L. R. These are the Ayats of Revelation,- of a Qur'an that makes things clear.
Again and again will those who disbelieve, wish that they had bowed (to God's will) in Islam.
Leave them alone, to enjoy (the good things of this life) and to please themselves: let (false) hope amuse them: soon will knowledge (undeceive them).
Never did We destroy a population that had not a term decreed and assigned beforehand.
Neither can a people anticipate its term, nor delay it.
They say: "O thou to whom the Message is being revealed! truly thou art mad (or possessed)!
"Why bringest thou not angels to us if it be that thou hast the Truth?"
We send not the angels down except for just cause: if they came (to the ungodly), behold! no respite would they have!
We have, without doubt, sent down the Message; and We will assuredly guard it (from corruption).
We did send apostles before thee amongst the religious sects of old:
But never came an apostle to them but they mocked him.
Even so do we let it creep into the hearts of the sinners -
That they should not believe in the (Message); but the ways of the ancients have passed away.
Even if We opened out to them a gate from heaven, and they were to continue (all day) ascending therein,
They would only say: "Our eyes have been intoxicated: Nay, we have been bewitched by sorcery."
It is We Who have set out the zodiacal signs in the heavens, and made them fair-seeming to (all) beholders;
And (moreover) We have guarded them from every evil spirit accursed:
But any that gains a hearing by stealth, is pursued by a flaming fire, bright (to see).
And the earth We have spread out (like a carpet); set thereon mountains firm and immovable; and produced therein all kinds of things in due balance.
And We have provided therein means of subsistence,- for you and for those for whose sustenance ye are not responsible.
And there is not a thing but its (sources and) treasures (inexhaustible) are with Us; but We only send down thereof in due and ascertainable measures.
And We send the fecundating winds, then cause the rain to descend from the sky, therewith providing you with water (in abundance), though ye are not the guardians of its stores.
And verily, it is We Who give life, and Who give death: it is We Who remain inheritors (after all else passes away).
To Us are known those of you who hasten forward, and those who lag behind.
Assuredly it is thy Lord Who will gather them together: for He is perfect in Wisdom and Knowledge.
We created man from sounding clay, from mud moulded into shape;
And the Jinn race, We had created before, from the fire of a scorching wind.
Behold! thy Lord said to the angels: "I am about to create man, from sounding clay from mud moulded into shape;
"When I have fashioned him (in due proportion) and breathed into him of My spirit, fall ye down in obeisance unto him."
So the angels prostrated themselves, all of them together:
Not so Iblis: he refused to be among those who prostrated themselves.
(God) said: "O Iblis! what is your reason for not being among those who prostrated themselves?"
(Iblis) said: "I am not one to prostrate myself to man, whom Thou didst create from sounding clay, from mud moulded into shape."
(God) said: "Then get thee out from here; for thou art rejected, accursed.
"And the curse shall be on thee till the day of Judgment."
(Iblis) said: "O my Lord! give me then respite till the Day the (dead) are raised."
(God) said: "Respite is granted thee
"Till the Day of the Time appointed."
(Iblis) said: "O my Lord! because Thou hast put me in the wrong, I will make (wrong) fair-seeming to them on the earth, and I will put them all in the wrong,-
"Except Thy servants among them, sincere and purified (by Thy Grace)."
(God) said: "This (way of My sincere servants) is indeed a way that leads straight to Me.
"For over My servants no authority shalt thou have, except such as put themselves in the wrong and follow thee."
And verily, Hell is the promised abode for them all!
To it are seven gates: for each of those gates is a (special) class (of sinners) assigned.
The righteous (will be) amid gardens and fountains (of clear-flowing water).
(Their greeting will be): "Enter ye here in peace and security."
And We shall remove from their hearts any lurking sense of injury: (they will be) brothers (joyfully) facing each other on thrones (of dignity).
There no sense of fatigue shall touch them, nor shall they (ever) be asked to leave.
Tell My servants that I am indeed the Oft-forgiving, Most Merciful;
And that My Penalty will be indeed the most grievous Penalty.
Tell them about the guests of Abraham.
When they entered his presence and said, "Peace!" He said, "We feel afraid of you!"
They said: "Fear not! We give thee glad tidings of a son endowed with wisdom."
He said: "Do ye give me glad tidings that old age has seized me? Of what, then, is your good news?"
They said: "We give thee glad tidings in truth: be not then in despair!"
He said: "And who despairs of the mercy of his Lord, but such as go astray?"
Abraham said: "What then is the business on which ye (have come), O ye messengers (of God)?"
They said: "We have been sent to a people (deep) in sin,
"Excepting the adherents of Lut: them we are certainly (charged) to save (from harm),- All -
"Except his wife, who, We have ascertained, will be among those who will lag behind."
At length when the messengers arrived among the adherents of Lut,
He said: "Ye appear to be uncommon folk."
They said: "Yea, we have come to thee to accomplish that of which they doubt.
"We have brought to thee that which is inevitably due, and assuredly we tell the truth.
"Then travel by night with thy household, when a portion of the night (yet remains), and do thou bring up the rear: let no one amongst you look back, but pass on whither ye are ordered."
And We made known this decree to him, that the last remnants of those (sinners) should be cut off by the morning.
The inhabitants of the city came in (mad) joy (at news of the young men).
Lut said: "These are my guests: disgrace me not:
"But fear God, and shame me not."
They said: "Did we not forbid thee (to speak) for all and sundry?"
He said: "There are my daughters (to marry), if ye must act (so)."
Verily, by thy life (O Prophet), in their wild intoxication, they wander in distraction, to and fro.
But the (mighty) Blast overtook them before morning,
And We turned (the cities) upside down, and rained down on them brimstones hard as baked clay.
Behold! in this are Signs for those who by tokens do understand.
And the (cities were) right on the high-road.
Behold! in this is a sign for those who believed.
And the Companions of the Wood were also wrong-doers;
So We exacted retribution from them. They were both on an open highway, plain to see.
The Companions of the Rocky Tract also rejected the apostles:
We sent them Our Sings, but they persisted in turning away from them.
Out of the mountains did they hew (their) edifices, (feeling themselves) secure.
But the (mighty) Blast seized them of a morning,
And of no avail to them was all that they did (with such art and care)!
We created not the heavens, the earth, and all between them, but for just ends. And the Hour is surely coming (when this will be manifest). So overlook (any human faults) with gracious forgiveness.
For verily it is thy Lord who is the Master-Creator, knowing all things.
And We have bestowed upon thee the Seven Oft-repeated (verses) and the Grand Qur'an.
Strain not thine eyes. (Wistfully) at what We have bestowed on certain classes of them, nor grieve over them: but lower thy wing (in gentleness) to the believers.
And say: "I am indeed he that warneth openly and without ambiguity,"-
(Of just such wrath) as We sent down on those who divided (Scripture into arbitrary parts),-
(So also on such) as have made Qur'an into shreds (as they please).
Therefore, by the Lord, We will, of a surety, call them to account,
For all their deeds.
Therefore expound openly what thou art commanded, and turn away from those who join false gods with God.
For sufficient are We unto thee against those who scoff,-
Those who adopt, with God, another god: but soon will they come to know.
We do indeed know how thy heart is distressed at what they say.
But celebrate the praises of thy Lord, and be of those who prostrate themselves in adoration.
And serve thy Lord until there come unto thee the Hour that is Certain.
(Inevitable) cometh (to pass) the Command of God: seek ye not then to hasten it: Glory to Him, and far is He above having the partners they ascribe unto Him!
He doth send down His angels with inspiration of His Command, to such of His servants as He pleaseth, (saying): "Warn (Man) that there is no god but I: so do your duty unto Me."
He has created the heavens and the earth for just ends: Far is He above having the partners they ascribe to Him!
He has created man from a sperm-drop; and behold this same (man) becomes an open disputer!
And cattle He has created for you (men): from them ye derive warmth, and numerous benefits, and of their (meat) ye eat.
And ye have a sense of pride and beauty in them as ye drive them home in the evening, and as ye lead them forth to pasture in the morning.
And they carry your heavy loads to lands that ye could not (otherwise) reach except with souls distressed: for your Lord is indeed Most Kind, Most Merciful,
And (He has created) horses, mules, and donkeys, for you to ride and use for show; and He has created (other) things of which ye have no knowledge.
And unto God leads straight the Way, but there are ways that turn aside: if God had willed, He could have guided all of you.
It is He who sends down rain from the sky: from it ye drink, and out of it (grows) the vegetation on which ye feed your cattle.
With it He produces for you corn, olives, date-palms, grapes and every kind of fruit: verily in this is a sign for those who give thought.
He has made subject to you the Night and the Day; the sun and the moon; and the stars are in subjection by His Command: verily in this are Signs for men who are wise.
And the things on this earth which He has multiplied in varying colours (and qualities): verily in this is a sign for men who celebrate the praises of God (in gratitude).
It is He Who has made the sea subject, that ye may eat thereof flesh that is fresh and tender, and that ye may extract therefrom ornaments to wear; and thou seest the ships therein that plough the waves, that ye may seek (thus) of the bounty of God and that ye may be grateful.
And He has set up on the earth mountains standing firm, lest it should shake with you; and rivers and roads; that ye may guide yourselves;
And marks and sign-posts; and by the stars (men) guide themselves.
Is then He Who creates like one that creates not? Will ye not receive admonition?
If ye would count up the favours of God, never would ye be able to number them: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
And God doth know what ye conceal, and what ye reveal.
Those whom they invoke besides God create nothing and are themselves created.
(They are things) dead, lifeless: nor do they know when they will be raised up.
Your God is one God: as to those who believe not in the Hereafter, their hearts refuse to know, and they are arrogant.
Undoubtedly God doth know what they conceal, and what they reveal: verily He loveth not the arrogant.
When it is said to them, "What is it that your Lord has revealed?" they say, "Tales of the ancients!"
Let them bear, on the Day of Judgment, their own burdens in full, and also (something) of the burdens of those without knowledge, whom they misled. Alas, how grievous the burdens they will bear!
Those before them did also plot (against God's Way): but God took their structures from their foundations, and the roof fell down on them from above; and the Wrath seized them from directions they did not perceive.
Then, on the Day of Judgment, He will cover them with shame, and say: "Where are My 'partners' concerning whom ye used to dispute (with the godly)?" Those endued with knowledge will say: "This Day, indeed, are the Unbelievers covered with shame and misery,-
"(Namely) those whose lives the angels take in a state of wrong-doing to their own souls." Then would they offer submission (with the pretence), "We did no evil (knowingly)." (The angels will reply), "Nay, but verily God knoweth all that ye did;
"So enter the gates of Hell, to dwell therein. Thus evil indeed is the abode of the arrogant."
To the righteous (when) it is said, "What is it that your Lord has revealed?" they say, "All that is good." To those who do good, there is good in this world, and the Home of the Hereafter is even better and excellent indeed is the Home of the righteous,-
Gardens of Eternity which they will enter: beneath them flow (pleasant) rivers: they will have therein all that they wish: thus doth God reward the righteous,-
(Namely) those whose lives the angels take in a state of purity, saying (to them), "Peace be on you; enter ye the Garden, because of (the good) which ye did (in the world)."
Do the (ungodly) wait until the angels come to them, or there comes the Command of thy Lord (for their doom)? So did those who went before them. But God wronged them not: nay, they wronged their own souls.
But the evil results of their deeds overtook them, and that very (Wrath) at which they had scoffed hemmed them in.
The worshippers of false gods say: "If God had so willed, we should not have worshipped aught but Him - neither we nor our fathers,- nor should we have prescribed prohibitions other than His." So did those who went before them. But what is the mission of apostles but to preach the Clear Message?
For We assuredly sent amongst every People an apostle, (with the Command), "Serve God, and eschew Evil": of the People were some whom God guided, and some on whom error became inevitably (established). So travel through the earth, and see what was the end of those who denied (the Truth).
If thou art anxious for their guidance, yet God guideth not such as He leaves to stray, and there is none to help them.
They swear their strongest oaths by God, that God will not raise up those who die: Nay, but it is a promise (binding) on Him in truth: but most among mankind realise it not.
(They must be raised up), in order that He may manifest to them the truth of that wherein they differ, and that the rejecters of Truth may realise that they had indeed (surrendered to) Falsehood.
For to anything which We have willed, We but say the word, "Be", and it is.
To those who leave their homes in the cause of God, after suffering oppression,- We will assuredly give a goodly home in this world; but truly the reward of the Hereafter will be greater. If they only realised (this)!
(They are) those who persevere in patience, and put their trust on their Lord.
And before thee also the apostles We sent were but men, to whom We granted inspiration: if ye realise this not, ask of those who possess the Message.
(We sent them) with Clear Signs and Books of dark prophecies; and We have sent down unto thee (also) the Message; that thou mayest explain clearly to men what is sent for them, and that they may give thought.
Do then those who devise evil (plots) feel secure that God will not cause the earth to swallow them up, or that the Wrath will not seize them from directions they little perceive?-
Or that He may not call them to account in the midst of their goings to and fro, without a chance of their frustrating Him?-
Or that He may not call them to account by a process of slow wastage - for thy Lord is indeed full of kindness and mercy.
Do they not look at God's creation, (even) among (inanimate) things,- How their (very) shadows turn round, from the right and the left, prostrating themselves to God, and that in the humblest manner?
And to God doth obeisance all that is in the heavens and on earth, whether moving (living) creatures or the angels: for none are arrogant (before their Lord).
They all revere their Lord, high above them, and they do all that they are commanded.
God has said: "Take not (for worship) two gods: for He is just One God: then fear Me (and Me alone)."
To Him belongs whatever is in the heavens and on earth, and to Him is duty due always: then will ye fear other than God?
And ye have no good thing but is from God: and moreover, when ye are touched by distress, unto Him ye cry with groans;
Yet, when He removes the distress from you, behold! some of you turn to other gods to join with their Lord-
(As if) to show their ingratitude for the favours we have bestowed on them! then enjoy (your brief day): but soon will ye know (your folly)!
And they (even) assign, to things they do not know, a portion out of that which We have bestowed for their sustenance! By God, ye shall certainly be called to account for your false inventions.
And they assign daughters for God! - Glory be to Him! - and for themselves (sons,- the issue) they desire!
When news is brought to one of them, of (the birth of) a female (child), his face darkens, and he is filled with inward grief!
With shame does he hide himself from his people, because of the bad news he has had! Shall he retain it on (sufferance and) contempt, or bury it in the dust? Ah! what an evil (choice) they decide on?
To those who believe not in the Hereafter, applies the similitude of evil: to God applies the highest similitude: for He is the Exalted in Power, full of Wisdom.
If God were to punish men for their wrong-doing, He would not leave, on the (earth), a single living creature: but He gives them respite for a stated Term: When their Term expires, they would not be able to delay (the punishment) for a single hour, just as they would not be able to anticipate it (for a single hour).
They attribute to God what they hate (for themselves), and their tongues assert the falsehood that all good things are for themselves: without doubt for them is the Fire, and they will be the first to be hastened on into it!
By God, We (also) sent (Our apostles) to Peoples before thee; but Satan made, (to the wicked), their own acts seem alluring: He is also their patron today, but they shall have a most grievous penalty.
And We sent down the Book to thee for the express purpose, that thou shouldst make clear to them those things in which they differ, and that it should be a guide and a mercy to those who believe.
And God sends down rain from the skies, and gives therewith life to the earth after its death: verily in this is a Sign for those who listen.
And verily in cattle (too) will ye find an instructive sign. From what is within their bodies between excretions and blood, We produce, for your drink, milk, pure and agreeable to those who drink it.
And from the fruit of the date-palm and the vine, ye get out wholesome drink and food: behold, in this also is a sign for those who are wise.
And thy Lord taught the Bee to build its cells in hills, on trees, and in (men's) habitations;
Then to eat of all the produce (of the earth), and find with skill the spacious paths of its Lord: there issues from within their bodies a drink of varying colours, wherein is healing for men: verily in this is a Sign for those who give thought.
It is God who creates you and takes your souls at death; and of you there are some who are sent back to a feeble age, so that they know nothing after having known (much): for God is All-Knowing, All-Powerful.
God has bestowed His gifts of sustenance more freely on some of you than on others: those more favoured are not going to throw back their gifts to those whom their right hands possess, so as to be equal in that respect. Will they then deny the favours of God?
And God has made for you mates (and companions) of your own nature, and made for you, out of them, sons and daughters and grandchildren, and provided for you sustenance of the best: will they then believe in vain things, and be ungrateful for God's favours?-
And worship others than God,- such as have no power of providing them, for sustenance, with anything in heavens or earth, and cannot possibly have such power?
Invent not similitudes for God: for God knoweth, and ye know not.
God sets forth the Parable (of two men: one) a slave under the dominion of another; He has no power of any sort; and (the other) a man on whom We have bestowed goodly favours from Ourselves, and he spends thereof (freely), privately and publicly: are the two equal? (By no means;) praise be to God. But most of them understand not.
God sets forth (another) Parable of two men: one of them dumb, with no power of any sort; a wearisome burden is he to his master; whichever way be directs him, he brings no good: is such a man equal with one who commands Justice, and is on a Straight Way?
To God belongeth the Mystery of the heavens and the earth. And the Decision of the Hour (of Judgment) is as the twingkling of an eye, or even quicker: for God hath power over all things.
It is He Who brought you forth from the wombs of your mothers when ye knew nothing; and He gave you hearing and sight and intelligence and affections: that ye may give thanks (to God).
Do they not look at the birds, held poised in the midst of (the air and) the sky? Nothing holds them up but (the power of) God. Verily in this are signs for those who believe.
It is God Who made your habitations homes of rest and quiet for you; and made for you, out of the skins of animals, (tents for) dwellings, which ye find so light (and handy) when ye travel and when ye stop (in your travels); and out of their wool, and their soft fibres (between wool and hair), and their hair, rich stuff and articles of convenience (to serve you) for a time.
It is God Who made out of the things He created, some things to give you shade; of the hills He made some for your shelter; He made you garments to protect you from heat, and coats of mail to protect you from your (mutual) violence. Thus does He complete His favours on you, that ye may bow to His Will (in Islam).
But if they turn away, thy duty is only to preach the clear Message.
They recognise the favours of God; then they deny them; and most of them are (creatures) ungrateful.
One Day We shall raise from all Peoples a Witness: then will no excuse be accepted from Unbelievers, nor will they receive any favours.
When the wrong-doers (actually) see the Penalty, then will it in no way be mitigated, nor will they then receive respite.
When those who gave partners to God will see their "partners", they will say: "Our Lord! these are our 'partners,' those whom we used to invoke besides Thee." But they will throw back their word at them (and say): "Indeed ye are liars!"
That Day shall they (openly) show (their) submission to God; and all their inventions shall leave them in the lurch.
Those who reject God and hinder (men) from the Path of God - for them will We add Penalty to Penalty; for that they used to spread mischief.
One day We shall raise from all Peoples a witness against them, from amongst themselves: and We shall bring thee as a witness against these (thy people): and We have sent down to thee the Book explaining all things, a Guide, a Mercy, and Glad Tidings to Muslims.
God commands justice, the doing of good, and liberality to kith and kin, and He forbids all shameful deeds, and injustice and rebellion: He instructs you, that ye may receive admonition.
Fulfil the Covenant of God when ye have entered into it, and break not your oaths after ye have confirmed them; indeed ye have made God your surety; for God knoweth all that ye do.
And be not like a woman who breaks into untwisted strands the yarn which she has spun, after it has become strong. Nor take your oaths to practise deception between yourselves, lest one party should be more numerous than another: for God will test you by this; and on the Day of Judgment He will certainly make clear to you (the truth of) that wherein ye disagree.
If God so willed, He could make you all one people: But He leaves straying whom He pleases, and He guides whom He pleases: but ye shall certainly be called to account for all your actions.
And take not your oaths, to practise deception between yourselves, with the result that someone's foot may slip after it was firmly planted, and ye may have to taste the evil (consequences) of having hindered (men) from the Path of God, and a Mighty Wrath descend on you.
Nor sell the covenant of God for a miserable price: for with God is (a prize) far better for you, if ye only knew.
What is with you must vanish: what is with God will endure. And We will certainly bestow, on those who patiently persevere, their reward according to the best of their actions.
Whoever works righteousness, man or woman, and has Faith, verily, to him will We give a new Life, a life that is good and pure and We will bestow on such their reward according to the best of their actions.
When thou dost read the Qur'an, seek God's protection from Satan the rejected one.
No authority has he over those who believe and put their trust in their Lord.
His authority is over those only, who take him as patron and who join partners with God.
When We substitute one revelation for another,- and God knows best what He reveals (in stages),- they say, "Thou art but a forger": but most of them understand not.
Say, the Holy Spirit has brought the revelation from thy Lord in Truth, in order to strengthen those who believe, and as a Guide and Glad Tidings to Muslims.
We know indeed that they say, "It is a man that teaches him." The tongue of him they wickedly point to is notably foreign, while this is Arabic, pure and clear.
Those who believe not in the Signs of God,- God will not guide them, and theirs will be a grievous Penalty.
It is those who believe not in the Signs of God, that forge falsehood: it is they who lie!
Any one who, after accepting faith in God, utters Unbelief,- except under compulsion, his heart remaining firm in Faith - but such as open their breast to Unbelief, on them is Wrath from God, and theirs will be a dreadful Penalty.
This because they love the life of this world better than the Hereafter: and God will not guide those who reject Faith.
Those are they whose hearts, ears, and eyes God has sealed up, and they take no heed.
Without doubt, in the Hereafter they will perish.
But verily thy Lord,- to those who leave their homes after trials and persecutions,- and who thereafter strive and fight for the faith and patiently persevere,- Thy Lord, after all this is oft-forgiving, Most Merciful.
One Day every soul will come up struggling for itself, and every soul will be recompensed (fully) for all its actions, and none will be unjustly dealt with.
God sets forth a Parable: a city enjoying security and quiet, abundantly supplied with sustenance from every place: Yet was it ungrateful for the favours of God: so God made it taste of hunger and terror (in extremes) (closing in on it) like a garment (from every side), because of the (evil) which (its people) wrought.
And there came to them an Apostle from among themselves, but they falsely rejected him; so the Wrath seized them even in the midst of their iniquities.
So eat of the sustenance which God has provided for you, lawful and good; and be grateful for the favours of God, if it is He Whom ye serve.
He has only forbidden you dead meat, and blood, and the flesh of swine, and any (food) over which the name of other than God has been invoked. But if one is forced by necessity, without wilful disobedience, nor transgressing due limits,- then God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
But say not - for any false thing that your tongues may put forth,- "This is lawful, and this is forbidden," so as to ascribe false things to God. For those who ascribe false things to God, will never prosper.
(In such falsehood) is but a paltry profit; but they will have a most grievous Penalty.
To the Jews We prohibited such things as We have mentioned to thee before: We did them no wrong, but they were used to doing wrong to themselves.
But verily thy Lord,- to those who do wrong in ignorance, but who thereafter repent and make amends,- thy Lord, after all this, is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Abraham was indeed a model, devoutly obedient to God, (and) true in Faith, and he joined not gods with God:
He showed his gratitude for the favours of God, who chose him, and guided him to a Straight Way.
And We gave him Good in this world, and he will be, in the Hereafter, in the ranks of the Righteous.
So We have taught thee the inspired (Message), "Follow the ways of Abraham the True in Faith, and he joined not gods with God."
The Sabbath was only made (strict) for those who disagreed (as to its observance); But God will judge between them on the Day of Judgment, as to their differences.
Invite (all) to the Way of thy Lord with wisdom and beautiful preaching; and argue with them in ways that are best and most gracious: for thy Lord knoweth best, who have strayed from His Path, and who receive guidance.
And if ye do catch them out, catch them out no worse than they catch you out: But if ye show patience, that is indeed the best (course) for those who are patient.
And do thou be patient, for thy patience is but from God; nor grieve over them: and distress not thyself because of their plots.
For God is with those who restrain themselves, and those who do good.
Glory to (God) Who did take His servant for a Journey by night from the Sacred Mosque to the farthest Mosque, whose precincts We did bless,- in order that We might show him some of Our Signs: for He is the One Who heareth and seeth (all things).
We gave Moses the Book, and made it a Guide to the Children of Israel, (commanding): "Take not other than Me as Disposer of (your) affairs."
O ye that are sprung from those whom We carried (in the Ark) with Noah! Verily he was a devotee most grateful.
And We gave (Clear) Warning to the Children of Israel in the Book, that twice would they do mischief on the earth and be elated with mighty arrogance (and twice would they be punished)!
When the first of the warnings came to pass, We sent against you Our servants given to terrible warfare: They entered the very inmost parts of your homes; and it was a warning (completely) fulfilled.
Then did We grant you the Return as against them: We gave you increase in resources and sons, and made you the more numerous in man-power.
If ye did well, ye did well for yourselves; if ye did evil, (ye did it) against yourselves. So when the second of the warnings came to pass, (We permitted your enemies) to disfigure your faces, and to enter your Temple as they had entered it before, and to visit with destruction all that fell into their power.
It may be that your Lord may (yet) show Mercy unto you; but if ye revert (to your sins), We shall revert (to Our punishments): And we have made Hell a prison for those who reject (all Faith).
Verily this Qur'an doth guide to that which is most right (or stable), and giveth the Glad Tidings to the Believers who work deeds of righteousness, that they shall have a magnificent reward;
And to those who believe not in the Hereafter, (it announceth) that We have prepared for them a Penalty Grievous (indeed).
The prayer that man should make for good, he maketh for evil; for man is given to hasty (deeds).
We have made the Night and the Day as two (of Our) Signs: the Sign of the Night have We obscured, while the Sign of the Day We have made to enlighten you; that ye may seek bounty from your Lord, and that ye may know the number and count of the years: all things have We explained in detail.
Every man's fate We have fastened on his own neck: On the Day of Judgment We shall bring out for him a scroll, which he will see spread open.
(It will be said to him:) "Read thine (own) record: Sufficient is thy soul this day to make out an account against thee."
Who receiveth guidance, receiveth it for his own benefit: who goeth astray doth so to his own loss: No bearer of burdens can bear the burden of another: nor would We visit with Our Wrath until We had sent an apostle (to give warning).
When We decide to destroy a population, We (first) send a definite order to those among them who are given the good things of this life and yet transgress; so that the word is proved true against them: then (it is) We destroy them utterly.
How many generations have We destroyed after Noah? and enough is thy Lord to note and see the sins of His servants.
If any do wish for the transitory things (of this life), We readily grant them - such things as We will, to such person as We will: in the end have We provided Hell for them: they will burn therein, disgraced and rejected.
Those who do wish for the (things of) the Hereafter, and strive therefor with all due striving, and have Faith,- they are the ones whose striving is acceptable (to God).
Of the bounties of thy Lord We bestow freely on all- These as well as those: The bounties of thy Lord are not closed (to anyone).
See how We have bestowed more on some than on others; but verily the Hereafter is more in rank and gradation and more in excellence.
Take not with God another object of worship; or thou (O man!) wilt sit in disgrace and destitution.
Thy Lord hath decreed that ye worship none but Him, and that ye be kind to parents. Whether one or both of them attain old age in thy life, say not to them a word of contempt, nor repel them, but address them in terms of honour.
And, out of kindness, lower to them the wing of humility, and say: "My Lord! bestow on them thy Mercy even as they cherished me in childhood."
Your Lord knoweth best what is in your hearts: If ye do deeds of righteousness, verily He is Most Forgiving to those who turn to Him again and again (in true penitence).
And render to the kindred their due rights, as (also) to those in want, and to the wayfarer: But squander not (your wealth) in the manner of a spendthrift.
Verily spendthrifts are brothers of the Evil Ones; and the Evil One is to his Lord (himself) ungrateful.
And even if thou hast to turn away from them in pursuit of the Mercy from thy Lord which thou dost expect, yet speak to them a word of easy kindness.
Make not thy hand tied (like a niggard's) to thy neck, nor stretch it forth to its utmost reach, so that thou become blameworthy and destitute.
Verily thy Lord doth provide sustenance in abundance for whom He pleaseth, and He provideth in a just measure. For He doth know and regard all His servants.
Kill not your children for fear of want: We shall provide sustenance for them as well as for you. Verily the killing of them is a great sin.
Nor come nigh to adultery: for it is a shameful (deed) and an evil, opening the road (to other evils).
Nor take life - which God has made sacred - except for just cause. And if anyone is slain wrongfully, we have given his heir authority (to demand qisas or to forgive): but let him nor exceed bounds in the matter of taking life; for he is helped (by the Law).
Come not nigh to the orphan's property except to improve it, until he attains the age of full strength; and fulfil (every) engagement, for (every) engagement will be enquired into (on the Day of Reckoning).
Give full measure when ye measure, and weigh with a balance that is straight: that is the most fitting and the most advantageous in the final determination.
And pursue not that of which thou hast no knowledge; for every act of hearing, or of seeing or of (feeling in) the heart will be enquired into (on the Day of Reckoning).
Nor walk on the earth with insolence: for thou canst not rend the earth asunder, nor reach the mountains in height.
Of all such things the evil is hateful in the sight of thy Lord.
These are among the (precepts of) wisdom, which thy Lord has revealed to thee. Take not, with God, another object of worship, lest thou shouldst be thrown into Hell, blameworthy and rejected.
Has then your Lord (O Pagans!) preferred for you sons, and taken for Himself daughters among the angels? Truly ye utter a most dreadful saying!
We have explained (things) in various (ways) in this Qur'an, in order that they may receive admonition, but it only increases their flight (from the Truth)!
Say: If there had been (other) gods with Him, as they say,- behold, they would certainly have sought out a way to the Lord of the Throne!
Glory to Him! He is high above all that they say!- Exalted and Great (beyond measure)!
The seven heavens and the earth, and all beings therein, declare His glory: there is not a thing but celebrates His praise; And yet ye understand not how they declare His glory! Verily He is Oft-Forbear, Most Forgiving!
When thou dost recite the Qur'an, We put, between thee and those who believe not in the Hereafter, a veil invisible:
And We put coverings over their hearts (and minds) lest they should understand the Qur'an, and deafness into their ears: when thou dost commemorate thy Lord and Him alone in the Qur'an, they turn on their backs, fleeing (from the Truth).
We know best why it is they listen, when they listen to thee; and when they meet in private conference, behold, the wicked say, "Ye follow none other than a man bewitched!"
See what similes they strike for thee: but they have gone astray, and never can they find a way.
They say: "What! when we are reduced to bones and dust, should we really be raised up (to be) a new creation?"
Say: "(Nay!) be ye stones or iron,
"Or created matter which, in your minds, is hardest (to be raised up),- (Yet shall ye be raised up)!" then will they say: "Who will cause us to return?" Say: "He who created you first!" Then will they wag their heads towards thee, and say, "When will that be?" Say, "May be it will be quite soon!
"It will be on a Day when He will call you, and ye will answer (His call) with (words of) His praise, and ye will think that ye tarried but a little while!"
Say to My servants that they should (only) say those things that are best: for Satan doth sow dissensions among them: For Satan is to man an avowed enemy.
It is your Lord that knoweth you best: If He please, He granteth you mercy, or if He please, punishment: We have not sent thee to be a disposer of their affairs for them.
And it is your Lord that knoweth best all beings that are in the heavens and on earth: We did bestow on some prophets more (and other) gifts than on others: and We gave to David (the gift of) the Psalms.
Say: "Call on those - besides Him - whom ye fancy: they have neither the power to remove your troubles from you nor to change them."
Those whom they call upon do desire (for themselves) means of access to their Lord, - even those who are nearest: they hope for His Mercy and fear His Wrath: for the Wrath of thy Lord is something to take heed of.
There is not a population but We shall destroy it before the Day of Judgment or punish it with a dreadful Penalty: that is written in the (eternal) Record.
And We refrain from sending the signs, only because the men of former generations treated them as false: We sent the she-camel to the Thamud to open their eyes, but they treated her wrongfully: We only send the Signs by way of terror (and warning from evil).
Behold! We told thee that thy Lord doth encompass mankind round about: We granted the vision which We showed thee, but as a trial for men,- as also the Cursed Tree (mentioned) in the Qur'an: We put terror (and warning) into them, but it only increases their inordinate transgression!
Behold! We said to the angels: "Bow down unto Adam": They bowed down except Iblis: He said, "Shall I bow down to one whom Thou didst create from clay?"
He said: "Seest Thou? this is the one whom Thou hast honoured above me! If Thou wilt but respite me to the Day of Judgment, I will surely bring his descendants under my sway - all but a few!"
(God) said: "Go thy way; if any of them follow thee, verily Hell will be the recompense of you (all)- an ample recompense.
"Lead to destruction those whom thou canst among them, with thy (seductive) voice; make assaults on them with thy cavalry and thy infantry; mutually share with them wealth and children; and make promises to them." But Satan promises them nothing but deceit.
"As for My servants, no authority shalt thou have over them:" Enough is thy Lord for a Disposer of affairs.
Your Lord is He That maketh the Ship go smoothly for you through the sea, in order that ye may seek of his Bounty. For he is unto you most Merciful.
When distress seizes you at sea, those that ye call upon - besides Himself - leave you in the lurch! but when He brings you back safe to land, ye turn away (from Him). Most ungrateful is man!
Do ye then feel secure that He will not cause you to be swallowed up beneath the earth when ye are on land, or that He will not send against you a violent tornado (with showers of stones) so that ye shall find no one to carry out your affairs for you?
Or do ye feel secure that He will not send you back a second time to sea and send against you a heavy gale to drown you because of your ingratitude, so that ye find no helper. Therein against Us?
We have honoured the sons of Adam; provided them with transport on land and sea; given them for sustenance things good and pure; and conferred on them special favours, above a great part of our creation.
One day We shall call together all human beings with their (respective) Imams: those who are given their record in their right hand will read it (with pleasure), and they will not be dealt with unjustly in the least.
But those who were blind in this world, will be blind in the hereafter, and most astray from the Path.
And their purpose was to tempt thee away from that which We had revealed unto thee, to substitute in our name something quite different; (in that case), behold! they would certainly have made thee (their) friend!
And had We not given thee strength, thou wouldst nearly have inclined to them a little.
In that case We should have made thee taste an equal portion (of punishment) in this life, and an equal portion in death: and moreover thou wouldst have found none to help thee against Us!
Their purpose was to scare thee off the land, in order to expel thee; but in that case they would not have stayed (therein) after thee, except for a little while.
(This was Our) way with the apostles We sent before thee: thou wilt find no change in Our ways.
Establish regular prayers - at the sun's decline till the darkness of the night, and the morning prayer and reading: for the prayer and reading in the morning carry their testimony.
And pray in the small watches of the morning: (it would be) an additional prayer (or spiritual profit) for thee: soon will thy Lord raise thee to a Station of Praise and Glory!
Say: "O my Lord! Let my entry be by the Gate of Truth and Honour, and likewise my exit by the Gate of Truth and Honour; and grant me from Thy Presence an authority to aid (me)."
And say: "Truth has (now) arrived, and Falsehood perished: for Falsehood is (by its nature) bound to perish."
We send down (stage by stage) in the Qur'an that which is a healing and a mercy to those who believe: to the unjust it causes nothing but loss after loss.
Yet when We bestow Our favours on man, he turns away and becomes remote on his side (instead of coming to Us), and when evil seizes him he gives himself up to despair!
Say: "Everyone acts according to his own disposition: But your Lord knows best who it is that is best guided on the Way."
They ask thee concerning the Spirit (of inspiration). Say: "The Spirit (cometh) by command of my Lord: of knowledge it is only a little that is communicated to you, (O men!)"
If it were Our Will, We could take away that which We have sent thee by inspiration:then wouldst thou find none to plead thy affair in that matter as against Us,-
Except for Mercy from thy Lord: for his bounty is to thee (indeed) great.
Say: "If the whole of mankind and Jinns were to gather together to produce the like of this Qur'an, they could not produce the like thereof, even if they backed up each other with help and support.
And We have explained to man, in this Qur'an, every kind of similitude: yet the greater part of men refuse (to receive it) except with ingratitude!
They say: "We shall not believe in thee, until thou cause a spring to gush forth for us from the earth,
"Or (until) thou have a garden of date trees and vines, and cause rivers to gush forth in their midst, carrying abundant water;
"Or thou cause the sky to fall in pieces, as thou sayest (will happen), against us; or thou bring God and the angels before (us) face to face:
"Or thou have a house adorned with gold, or thou mount a ladder right into the skies. No, we shall not even believe in thy mounting until thou send down to us a book that we could read." Say: "Glory to my Lord! Am I aught but a man,- an apostle?"
What kept men back from belief when Guidance came to them, was nothing but this: they said, "Has God sent a man (like us) to be (His) Apostle?"
Say, "If there were settled, on earth, angels walking about in peace and quiet, We should certainly have sent them down from the heavens an angel for an apostle."
Say: "Enough is God for a witness between me and you: for He is well acquainted with His servants, and He sees (all things).
It is he whom God guides, that is on true Guidance; but he whom He leaves astray - for such wilt thou find no protector besides Him. On the Day of Judgment We shall gather, them together, prone on their faces, blind, dumb, and deaf: their abode will be Hell: every time it shows abatement, We shall increase from them the fierceness of the Fire.
That is their recompense, because they rejected Our signs, and said, "When we are reduced to bones and broken dust, should we really be raised up (to be) a new Creation?"
See they not that God, Who created the heavens and the earth, has power to create the like of them (anew)? Only He has decreed a term appointed, of which there is no doubt. But the unjust refuse (to receive it) except with ingratitude.
Say: "If ye had control of the Treasures of the Mercy of my Lord, behold, ye would keep them back, for fear of spending them: for man is (every) niggardly!"
To Moses We did give Nine Clear Sings: As the Children of Israel: when he came to them, Pharaoh said to him: "O Moses! I consider thee, indeed, to have been worked upon by sorcery!
Moses said, "Thou knowest well that these things have been sent down by none but the Lord of the heavens and the earth as eye-opening evidence: and I consider thee indeed, O Pharaoh, to be one doomed to destruction!"
So he resolved to remove them from the face of the earth: but We did drown him and all who were with him.
And We said thereafter to the Children of Israel, "Dwell securely in the land (of promise)": but when the second of the warnings came to pass, We gathered you together in a mingled crowd.
We sent down the (Qur'an) in Truth, and in Truth has it descended: and We sent thee but to give Glad Tidings and to warn (sinners).
(It is) a Qur'an which We have divided (into parts from time to time), in order that thou mightest recite it to men at intervals: We have revealed it by stages.
Say: "Whether ye believe in it or not, it is true that those who were given knowledge beforehand, when it is recited to them, fall down on their faces in humble prostration,
"And they say: 'Glory to our Lord! Truly has the promise of our Lord been fulfilled!'"
They fall down on their faces in tears, and it increases their (earnest) humility.
Say: "Call upon God, or call upon Rahman: by whatever name ye call upon Him, (it is well): for to Him belong the Most Beautiful Names. Neither speak thy Prayer aloud, nor speak it in a low tone, but seek a middle course between."
Say: "Praise be to God, who begets no son, and has no partner in (His) dominion: Nor (needs) He any to protect Him from humiliation: yea, magnify Him for His greatness and glory!"
Praise be to God, Who hath sent to His Servant the Book, and hath allowed therein no Crookedness:
(He hath made it) Straight (and Clear) in order that He may warn (the godless) of a terrible Punishment from Him, and that He may give Glad Tidings to the Believers who work righteous deeds, that they shall have a goodly Reward,
Wherein they shall remain for ever:
Further, that He may warn those (also) who say, "God hath begotten a son":
No knowledge have they of such a thing, nor had their fathers. It is a grievous thing that issues from their mouths as a saying what they say is nothing but falsehood!
Thou wouldst only, perchance, fret thyself to death, following after them, in grief, if they believe not in this Message.
That which is on earth we have made but as a glittering show for the earth, in order that We may test them - as to which of them are best in conduct.
Verily what is on earth we shall make but as dust and dry soil (without growth or herbage).
Or dost thou reflect that the Companions of the Cave and of the Inscription were wonders among Our Sign?
Behold, the youths betook themselves to the Cave: they said, "Our Lord! bestow on us Mercy from Thyself, and dispose of our affair for us in the right way!"
Then We draw (a veil) over their ears, for a number of years, in the Cave, (so that they heard not):
Then We roused them, in order to test which of the two parties was best at calculating the term of years they had tarried!
We relate to thee their story in truth: they were youths who believed in their Lord, and We advanced them in guidance:
We gave strength to their hearts: Behold, they stood up and said: "Our Lord is the Lord of the heavens and of the earth: never shall we call upon any god other than Him: if we did, we should indeed have uttered an enormity!
"These our people have taken for worship gods other than Him: why do they not bring forward an authority clear (and convincing) for what they do? Who doth more wrong than such as invent a falsehood against God?
"When ye turn away from them and the things they worship other than God, betake yourselves to the Cave: Your Lord will shower His mercies on you and disposes of your affair towards comfort and ease."
Thou wouldst have seen the sun, when it rose, declining to the right from their Cave, and when it set, turning away from them to the left, while they lay in the open space in the midst of the Cave. Such are among the Signs of God: He whom God, guides is rightly guided; but he whom God leaves to stray,- for him wilt thou find no protector to lead him to the Right Way.
Thou wouldst have deemed them awake, whilst they were asleep, and We turned them on their right and on their left sides: their dog stretching forth his two fore-legs on the threshold: if thou hadst come up on to them, thou wouldst have certainly turned back from them in flight, and wouldst certainly have been filled with terror of them.
Such (being their state), we raised them up (from sleep), that they might question each other. Said one of them, "How long have ye stayed (here)?" They said, "We have stayed (perhaps) a day, or part of a day." (At length) they (all) said, "God (alone) knows best how long ye have stayed here.... Now send ye then one of you with this money of yours to the town: let him find out which is the best food (to be had) and bring some to you, that (ye may) satisfy your hunger therewith: And let him behave with care and courtesy, and let him not inform any one about you.
"For if they should come upon you, they would stone you or force you to return to their cult, and in that case ye would never attain prosperity."
Thus did We make their case known to the people, that they might know that the promise of God is true, and that there can be no doubt about the Hour of Judgment. Behold, they dispute among themselves as to their affair. (Some) said, "Construct a building over them": Their Lord knows best about them: those who prevailed over their affair said, "Let us surely build a place of worship over them."
(Some) say they were three, the dog being the fourth among them; (others) say they were five, the dog being the sixth,- doubtfully guessing at the unknown; (yet others) say they were seven, the dog being the eighth. Say thou: "My Lord knoweth best their number; It is but few that know their (real case)." Enter not, therefore, into controversies concerning them, except on a matter that is clear, nor consult any of them about (the affair of) the Sleepers.
Nor say of anything, "I shall be sure to do so and so tomorrow"-
Without adding, "So please God!" and call thy Lord to mind when thou forgettest, and say, "I hope that my Lord will guide me ever closer (even) than this to the right road."
So they stayed in their Cave three hundred years, and (some) add nine (more)
Say: "God knows best how long they stayed: with Him is (the knowledge of) the secrets of the heavens and the earth: how clearly He sees, how finely He hears (everything)! They have no protector other than Him; nor does He share His Command with any person whatsoever.
And recite (and teach) what has been revealed to thee of the Book of thy Lord: none can change His Words, and none wilt thou find as a refuge other than Him.
And keep thy soul content with those who call on their Lord morning and evening, seeking His Face; and let not thine eyes pass beyond them, seeking the pomp and glitter of this Life; no obey any whose heart We have permitted to neglect the remembrance of Us, one who follows his own desires, whose case has gone beyond all bounds.
Say, "The truth is from your Lord": Let him who will believe, and let him who will, reject (it): for the wrong-doers We have prepared a Fire whose (smoke and flames), like the walls and roof of a tent, will hem them in: if they implore relief they will be granted water like melted brass, that will scald their faces, how dreadful the drink! How uncomfortable a couch to recline on!
As to those who believe and work righteousness, verily We shall not suffer to perish the reward of any who do a (single) righteous deed.
For them will be Gardens of Eternity; beneath them rivers will flow; they will be adorned therein with bracelets of gold, and they will wear green garments of fine silk and heavy brocade: They will recline therein on raised thrones. How good the recompense! How beautiful a couch to recline on!
Set forth to them the parable of two men: for one of them We provided two gardens of grape-vines and surrounded them with date palms; in between the two We placed corn-fields.
Each of those gardens brought forth its produce, and failed not in the least therein: in the midst of them We caused a river to flow.
(Abundant) was the produce this man had : he said to his companion, in the course of a mutual argument: "more wealth have I than you, and more honour and power in (my following of) men."
He went into his garden in a state (of mind) unjust to his soul: He said, "I deem not that this will ever perish,
"Nor do I deem that the Hour (of Judgment) will (ever) come: Even if I am brought back to my Lord, I shall surely find (there) something better in exchange."
His companion said to him, in the course of the argument with him: "Dost thou deny Him Who created thee out of dust, then out of a sperm-drop, then fashioned thee into a man?
"But (I think) for my part that He is God, My Lord, and none shall I associate with my Lord.
"Why didst thou not, as thou wentest into thy garden, say: 'God's will (be done)! There is no power but with God!' If thou dost see me less than thee in wealth and sons,
"It may be that my Lord will give me something better than thy garden, and that He will send on thy garden thunderbolts (by way of reckoning) from heaven, making it (but) slippery sand!-
"Or the water of the garden will run off underground so that thou wilt never be able to find it."
So his fruits (and enjoyment) were encompassed (with ruin), and he remained twisting and turning his hands over what he had spent on his property, which had (now) tumbled to pieces to its very foundations, and he could only say, "Woe is me! Would I had never ascribed partners to my Lord and Cherisher!"
Nor had he numbers to help him against God, nor was he able to deliver himself.
There, the (only) protection comes from God, the True One. He is the Best to reward, and the Best to give success.
Set forth to them the similitude of the life of this world: It is like the rain which we send down from the skies: the earth's vegetation absorbs it, but soon it becomes dry stubble, which the winds do scatter: it is (only) God who prevails over all things.
Wealth and sons are allurements of the life of this world: But the things that endure, good deeds, are best in the sight of thy Lord, as rewards, and best as (the foundation for) hopes.
One Day We shall remove the mountains, and thou wilt see the earth as a level stretch, and We shall gather them, all together, nor shall We leave out any one of them.
And they will be marshalled before thy Lord in ranks, (with the announcement), "Now have ye come to Us (bare) as We created you first: aye, ye thought We shall not fulfil the appointment made to you to meet (Us)!":
And the Book (of Deeds) will be placed (before you); and thou wilt see the sinful in great terror because of what is (recorded) therein; they will say, "Ah! woe to us! what a Book is this! It leaves out nothing small or great, but takes account thereof!" They will find all that they did, placed before them: And not one will thy Lord treat with injustice.
Behold! We said to the angels, "Bow down to Adam": They bowed down except Iblis. He was one of the Jinns, and he broke the Command of his Lord. Will ye then take him and his progeny as protectors rather than Me? And they are enemies to you! Evil would be the exchange for the wrong-doers!
I called them not to witness the creation of the heavens and the earth, nor (even) their own creation: nor is it for helpers such as Me to take as lead (men) astray!
One Day He will say, "Call on those whom ye thought to be My partners," and they will call on them, but they will not listen to them; and We shall make for them a place of common perdition.
And the Sinful shall see the fire and apprehend that they have to fall therein: no means will they find to turn away therefrom.
We have explained in detail in this Qur'an, for the benefit of mankind, every kind of similitude: but man is, in most things, contentious.
And what is there to keep back men from believing, now that Guidance has come to them, nor from praying for forgiveness from their Lord, but that (they ask that) the ways of the ancients be repeated with them, or the Wrath be brought to them face to face?
We only send the apostles to give Glad Tidings and to give warnings: But the unbelievers dispute with vain argument, in order therewith to weaken the truth, and they treat My Signs as a jest, as also the fact that they are warned!
And who doth more wrong than one who is reminded of the Signs of his Lord, but turns away from them, forgetting the (deeds) which his hands have sent forth? Verily We have set veils over their hearts lest they should understand this, and over their ears, deafness, if thou callest them to guidance, even then will they never accept guidance.
But your Lord is Most forgiving, full of Mercy. If He were to call them (at once) to account for what they have earned, then surely He would have earned, then surely He would have hastened their punishment: but they have their appointed time, beyond which they will find no refuge.
Such were the populations we destroyed when they committed iniquities; but we fixed an appointed time for their destruction.
Behold, Moses said to his attendant, "I will not give up until I reach the junction of the two seas or (until) I spend years and years in travel."
But when they reached the Junction, they forgot (about) their Fish, which took its course through the sea (straight) as in a tunnel.
When they had passed on (some distance), Moses said to his attendant: "Bring us our early meal; truly we have suffered much fatigue at this (stage of) our journey."
He replied: "Sawest thou (what happened) when we betook ourselves to the rock? I did indeed forget (about) the Fish: none but Satan made me forget to tell (you) about it: it took its course through the sea in a marvellous way!"
Moses said: "That was what we were seeking after:" So they went back on their footsteps, following (the path they had come).
So they found one of Our servants, on whom We had bestowed Mercy from Ourselves and whom We had taught knowledge from Our own Presence.
Moses said to him: "May I follow thee, on the footing that thou teach me something of the (Higher) Truth which thou hast been taught?"
(The other) said: "Verily thou wilt not be able to have patience with me!"
"And how canst thou have patience about things about which thy understanding is not complete?"
Moses said: "Thou wilt find me, if God so will, (truly) patient: nor shall I disobey thee in aught."
The other said: "If then thou wouldst follow me, ask me no questions about anything until I myself speak to thee concerning it."
So they both proceeded: until, when they were in the boat, he scuttled it. Said Moses: "Hast thou scuttled it in order to drown those in it? Truly a strange thing hast thou done!"
He answered: "Did I not tell thee that thou canst have no patience with me?"
Moses said: "Rebuke me not for forgetting, nor grieve me by raising difficulties in my case."
Then they proceeded: until, when they met a young man, he slew him. Moses said: "Hast thou slain an innocent person who had slain none? Truly a foul (unheard of) thing hast thou done!"
He answered: "Did I not tell thee that thou canst have no patience with me?"
(Moses) said: "If ever I ask thee about anything after this, keep me not in thy company: then wouldst thou have received (full) excuse from my side."
Then they proceeded: until, when they came to the inhabitants of a town, they asked them for food, but they refused them hospitality. They found there a wall on the point of falling down, but he set it up straight. (Moses) said: "If thou hadst wished, surely thou couldst have exacted some recompense for it!"
He answered: "This is the parting between me and thee: now will I tell thee the interpretation of (those things) over which thou wast unable to hold patience.
"As for the boat, it belonged to certain men in dire want: they plied on the water: I but wished to render it unserviceable, for there was after them a certain king who seized on every boat by force.
"As for the youth, his parents were people of Faith, and we feared that he would grieve them by obstinate rebellion and ingratitude (to God and man).
"So we desired that their Lord would give them in exchange (a son) better in purity (of conduct) and closer in affection.
"As for the wall, it belonged to two youths, orphans, in the Town; there was, beneath it, a buried treasure, to which they were entitled: their father had been a righteous man: So thy Lord desired that they should attain their age of full strength and get out their treasure - a mercy (and favour) from thy Lord. I did it not of my own accord. Such is the interpretation of (those things) over which thou wast unable to hold patience."
They ask thee concerning Zul-qarnain. Say, "I will rehearse to you something of his story."
Verily We established his power on earth, and We gave him the ways and the means to all ends.
One (such) way he followed,
Until, when he reached the setting of the sun, he found it set in a spring of murky water: Near it he found a People: We said: "O Zul-qarnain! (thou hast authority,) either to punish them, or to treat them with kindness."
He said: "Whoever doth wrong, him shall we punish; then shall he be sent back to his Lord; and He will punish him with a punishment unheard-of (before).
"But whoever believes, and works righteousness,- he shall have a goodly reward, and easy will be his task as We order it by our Command."
Then followed he (another) way,
Until, when he came to the rising of the sun, he found it rising on a people for whom We had provided no covering protection against the sun.
(He left them) as they were: We completely understood what was before him.
Then followed he (another) way,
Until, when he reached (a tract) between two mountains, he found, beneath them, a people who scarcely understood a word.
They said: "O Zul-qarnain! the Gog and Magog (People) do great mischief on earth: shall we then render thee tribute in order that thou mightest erect a barrier between us and them?
He said: "(The power) in which my Lord has established me is better (than tribute): Help me therefore with strength (and labour): I will erect a strong barrier between you and them:
"Bring me blocks of iron." At length, when he had filled up the space between the two steep mountain-sides, He said, "Blow (with your bellows)" Then, when he had made it (red) as fire, he said: "Bring me, that I may pour over it, molten lead."
Thus were they made powerless to scale it or to dig through it.
He said: "This is a mercy from my Lord: But when the promise of my Lord comes to pass, He will make it into dust; and the promise of my Lord is true."
On that day We shall leave them to surge like waves on one another: the trumpet will be blown, and We shall collect them all together.
And We shall present Hell that day for Unbelievers to see, all spread out,-
(Unbelievers) whose eyes had been under a veil from remembrance of Me, and who had been unable even to hear.
Do the Unbelievers think that they can take My servants as protectors besides Me? Verily We have prepared Hell for the Unbelievers for (their) entertainment.
Say: "Shall we tell you of those who lose most in respect of their deeds?-
"Those whose efforts have been wasted in this life, while they thought that they were acquiring good by their works?"
They are those who deny the Signs of their Lord and the fact of their having to meet Him (in the Hereafter): vain will be their works, nor shall We, on the Day of Judgment, give them any weight.
That is their reward, Hell, because they rejected Faith, and took My Signs and My Messengers by way of jest.
As to those who believe and work righteous deeds, they have, for their entertainment, the Gardens of Paradise,
Wherein they shall dwell (for aye): no change will they wish for from them.
Say: "If the ocean were ink (wherewith to write out) the words of my Lord, sooner would the ocean be exhausted than would the words of my Lord, even if we added another ocean like it, for its aid."
Say: "I am but a man like yourselves, (but) the inspiration has come to me, that your God is one God: whoever expects to meet his Lord, let him work righteousness, and, in the worship of his Lord, admit no one as partner.
Kaf. Ha. Ya. 'Ain. Sad.
(This is) a recital of the Mercy of thy Lord to His servant Zakariya.
Behold! he cried to his Lord in secret,
Praying: "O my Lord! infirm indeed are my bones, and the hair of my head doth glisten with grey: but never am I unblest, O my Lord, in my prayer to Thee!
"Now I fear (what) my relatives (and colleagues) (will do) after me: but my wife is barren: so give me an heir as from Thyself,-
"(One that) will (truly) represent me, and represent the posterity of Jacob; and make him, O my Lord! one with whom Thou art well-pleased!"
(His prayer was answered): "O Zakariya! We give thee good news of a son: His name shall be Yahya: on none by that name have We conferred distinction before."
He said: "O my Lord! How shall I have a son, when my wife is barren and I have grown quite decrepit from old age?"
He said: "So (it will be) thy Lord saith, 'that is easy for Me: I did indeed create thee before, when thou hadst been nothing!'"
(Zakariya) said: "O my Lord! give me a Sign." "Thy Sign," was the answer, "Shall be that thou shalt speak to no man for three nights, although thou art not dumb."
So Zakariya came out to his people from him chamber: He told them by signs to celebrate God's praises in the morning and in the evening.
(To his son came the command): "O Yahya! take hold of the Book with might": and We gave him Wisdom even as a youth,
And piety (for all creatures) as from Us, and purity: He was devout,
And kind to his parents, and he was not overbearing or rebellious.
So Peace on him the day he was born, the day that he dies, and the day that he will be raised up to life (again)!
Relate in the Book (the story of) Mary, when she withdrew from her family to a place in the East.
She placed a screen (to screen herself) from them; then We sent her our angel, and he appeared before her as a man in all respects.
She said: "I seek refuge from thee to (God) Most Gracious: (come not near) if thou dost fear God."
He said: "Nay, I am only a messenger from thy Lord, (to announce) to thee the gift of a holy son.
She said: "How shall I have a son, seeing that no man has touched me, and I am not unchaste?"
He said: "So (it will be): Thy Lord saith, 'that is easy for Me: and (We wish) to appoint him as a Sign unto men and a Mercy from Us':It is a matter (so) decreed."
So she conceived him, and she retired with him to a remote place.
And the pains of childbirth drove her to the trunk of a palm-tree: She cried (in her anguish): "Ah! would that I had died before this! would that I had been a thing forgotten and out of sight!"
But (a voice) cried to her from beneath the (palm-tree): "Grieve not! for thy Lord hath provided a rivulet beneath thee;
"And shake towards thyself the trunk of the palm-tree: It will let fall fresh ripe dates upon thee.
"So eat and drink and cool (thine) eye. And if thou dost see any man, say, 'I have vowed a fast to (God) Most Gracious, and this day will I enter into not talk with any human being'"
At length she brought the (babe) to her people, carrying him (in her arms). They said: "O Mary! truly an amazing thing hast thou brought!
"O sister of Aaron! Thy father was not a man of evil, nor thy mother a woman unchaste!"
But she pointed to the babe. They said: "How can we talk to one who is a child in the cradle?"
He said: "I am indeed a servant of God: He hath given me revelation and made me a prophet;
"And He hath made me blessed wheresoever I be, and hath enjoined on me Prayer and Charity as long as I live;
"(He) hath made me kind to my mother, and not overbearing or miserable;
"So peace is on me the day I was born, the day that I die, and the day that I shall be raised up to life (again)"!
Such (was) Jesus the son of Mary: (it is) a statement of truth, about which they (vainly) dispute.
It is not befitting to (the majesty of) God that He should beget a son. Glory be to Him! when He determines a matter, He only says to it, "Be", and it is.
Verily God is my Lord and your Lord: Him therefore serve ye: this is a Way that is straight.
But the sects differ among themselves: and woe to the unbelievers because of the (coming) Judgment of a Momentous Day!
How plainly will they see and hear, the Day that they will appear before Us! but the unjust today are in error manifest!
But warn them of the Day of Distress, when the matter will be determined: for (behold,) they are negligent and they do not believe!
It is We Who will inherit the earth, and all beings thereon: to Us will they all be returned.
(Also mention in the Book (the story of) Abraham: He was a man of Truth, a prophet.
Behold, he said to his father: "O my father! why worship that which heareth not and seeth not, and can profit thee nothing?
"O my father! to me hath come knowledge which hath not reached thee: so follow me: I will guide thee to a way that is even and straight.
"O my father! serve not Satan: for Satan is a rebel against (God) Most Gracious.
"O my father! I fear lest a Penalty afflict thee from (God) Most Gracious, so that thou become to Satan a friend."
(The father) replied: "Dost thou hate my gods, O Abraham? If thou forbear not, I will indeed stone thee: Now get away from me for a good long while!"
Abraham said: "Peace be on thee: I will pray to my Lord for thy forgiveness: for He is to me Most Gracious.
"And I will turn away from you (all) and from those whom ye invoke besides God: I will call on my Lord: perhaps, by my prayer to my Lord, I shall be not unblest."
When he had turned away from them and from those whom they worshipped besides God, We bestowed on him Isaac and Jacob, and each one of them We made a prophet.
And We bestowed of Our Mercy on them, and We granted them lofty honour on the tongue of truth.
Also mention in the Book (the story of) Moses: for he was specially chosen, and he was an apostle (and) a prophet.
And we called him from the right side of Mount (Sinai), and made him draw near to Us, for mystic (converse).
And, out of Our Mercy, We gave him his brother Aaron, (also) a prophet.
Also mention in the Book (the story of) Isma'il: He was (strictly) true to what he promised, and he was an apostle (and) a prophet.
He used to enjoin on his people Prayer and Charity, and he was most acceptable in the sight of his Lord.
Also mention in the Book the case of Idris: He was a man of truth (and sincerity), (and) a prophet:
And We raised him to a lofty station.
Those were some of the prophets on whom God did bestow His Grace,- of the posterity of Adam, and of those who We carried (in the Ark) with Noah, and of the posterity of Abraham and Israel of those whom We guided and chose. Whenever the Signs of (God) Most Gracious were rehearsed to them, they would fall down in prostrate adoration and in tears.
But after them there followed a posterity who missed prayers and followed after lusts soon, then, will they face Destruction,-
Except those who repent and believe, and work righteousness: for these will enter the Garden and will not be wronged in the least,-
Gardens of Eternity, those which (God) Most Gracious has promised to His servants in the Unseen: for His promise must (necessarily) come to pass.
They will not there hear any vain discourse, but only salutations of Peace: And they will have therein their sustenance, morning and evening.
Such is the Garden which We give as an inheritance to those of Our servants who guard against Evil.
(The angels say:) "We descend not but by command of thy Lord: to Him belongeth what is before us and what is behind us, and what is between: and thy Lord never doth forget,-
"Lord of the heavens and of the earth, and of all that is between them; so worship Him, and be constant and patient in His worship: knowest thou of any who is worthy of the same Name as He?"
Man says: "What! When I am dead, shall I then be raised up alive?"
But does not man call to mind that We created him before out of nothing?
So, by thy Lord, without doubt, We shall gather them together, and (also) the Evil Ones (with them); then shall We bring them forth on their knees round about Hell;
Then shall We certainly drag out from every sect all those who were worst in obstinate rebellion against (God) Most Gracious.
And certainly We know best those who are most worthy of being burned therein.
Not one of you but will pass over it: this is, with thy Lord, a Decree which must be accomplished.
But We shall save those who guarded against evil, and We shall leave the wrong-doers therein, (humbled) to their knees.
When Our Clear Signs are rehearsed to them, the Unbelievers say to those who believe, "Which of the two sides is best in point of position? Which makes the best show in council?"
But how many (countless) generations before them have we destroyed, who were even better in equipment and in glitter to the eye?
Say: "If any men go astray, (God) Most Gracious extends (the rope) to them, until, when they see the warning of God (being fulfilled) - either in punishment or in (the approach of) the Hour,- they will at length realise who is worst in position, and (who) weakest in forces!
"And God doth advance in guidance those who seek guidance: and the things that endure, Good Deeds, are best in the sight of thy Lord, as rewards, and best in respect of (their) eventual return."
Hast thou then seen the (sort of) man who rejects Our Signs, yet says: "I shall certainly be given wealth and children?"
Has he penetrated to the Unseen, or has he taken a contract with (God) Most Gracious?
Nay! We shall record what he says, and We shall add and add to his punishment.
To Us shall return all that he talks of and he shall appear before Us bare and alone.
And they have taken (for worship) gods other than God, to give them power and glory!
Instead, they shall reject their worship, and become adversaries against them.
Seest thou not that We have set the Evil Ones on against the unbelievers, to incite them with fury?
So make no haste against them, for We but count out to them a (limited) number (of days).
The day We shall gather the righteous to (God) Most Gracious, like a band presented before a king for honours,
And We shall drive the sinners to Hell, like thirsty cattle driven down to water,-
None shall have the power of intercession, but such a one as has received permission (or promise) from (God) Most Gracious.
They say: "(God) Most Gracious has begotten a son!"
Indeed ye have put forth a thing most monstrous!
At it the skies are ready to burst, the earth to split asunder, and the mountains to fall down in utter ruin,
That they should invoke a son for (God) Most Gracious.
For it is not consonant with the majesty of (God) Most Gracious that He should beget a son.
Not one of the beings in the heavens and the earth but must come to (God) Most Gracious as a servant.
He does take an account of them (all), and hath numbered them (all) exactly.
And everyone of them will come to Him singly on the Day of Judgment.
On those who believe and work deeds of righteousness, will (God) Most Gracious bestow love.
So have We made the (Qur'an) easy in thine own tongue, that with it thou mayest give Glad Tidings to the righteous, and warnings to people given to contention.
But how many (countless) generations before them have We destroyed? Canst thou find a single one of them (now) or hear (so much as) a whisper of them?
Ta-Ha.
We have not sent down the Qur'an to thee to be (an occasion) for thy distress,
But only as an admonition to those who fear (God),-
A revelation from Him Who created the earth and the heavens on high.
(God) Most Gracious is firmly established on the throne (of authority).
To Him belongs what is in the heavens and on earth, and all between them, and all beneath the soil.
If thou pronounce the word aloud, (it is no matter): for verily He knoweth what is secret and what is yet more hidden.
God! there is no god but He! To Him belong the most Beautiful Names.
Has the story of Moses reached thee?
Behold, he saw a fire: So he said to his family, "Tarry ye; I perceive a fire; perhaps I can bring you some burning brand therefrom, or find some guidance at the fire."
But when he came to the fire, a voice was heard: "O Moses!
"Verily I am thy Lord! therefore (in My presence) put off thy shoes: thou art in the sacred valley Tuwa.
"I have chosen thee: listen, then, to the inspiration (sent to thee).
"Verily, I am God: There is no god but I: So serve thou Me (only), and establish regular prayer for celebrating My praise.
"Verily the Hour is coming - My design is to keep it hidden - for every soul to receive its reward by the measure of its Endeavour.
"Therefore let not such as believe not therein but follow their own lusts, divert thee therefrom, lest thou perish!"..
"And what is that in the right hand, O Moses?"
He said, "It is my rod: on it I lean; with it I beat down fodder for my flocks; and in it I find other uses."
(God) said, "Throw it, O Moses!"
He threw it, and behold! It was a snake, active in motion.
(God) said, "Seize it, and fear not: We shall return it at once to its former condition"..
"Now draw thy hand close to thy side: It shall come forth white (and shining), without harm (or stain),- as another Sign,-
"In order that We may show thee (two) of our Greater Signs.
"Go thou to Pharaoh, for he has indeed transgressed all bounds."
(Moses) said: "O my Lord! expand me my breast;
"Ease my task for me;
"And remove the impediment from my speech,
"So they may understand what I say:
"And give me a Minister from my family,
"Aaron, my brother;
"Add to my strength through him,
"And make him share my task:
"That we may celebrate Thy praise without stint,
"And remember Thee without stint:
"For Thou art He that (ever) regardeth us."
(God) said: "Granted is thy prayer, O Moses!"
"And indeed We conferred a favour on thee another time (before).
"Behold! We sent to thy mother, by inspiration, the message:
"'Throw (the child) into the chest, and throw (the chest) into the river: the river will cast him up on the bank, and he will be taken up by one who is an enemy to Me and an enemy to him': But I cast (the garment of) love over thee from Me: and (this) in order that thou mayest be reared under Mine eye.
"Behold! thy sister goeth forth and saith, 'shall I show you one who will nurse and rear the (child)?' So We brought thee back to thy mother, that her eye might be cooled and she should not grieve. Then thou didst slay a man, but We saved thee from trouble, and We tried thee in various ways. Then didst thou tarry a number of years with the people of Midian. Then didst thou come hither as ordained, O Moses!
"And I have prepared thee for Myself (for service)"..
"Go, thou and thy brother, with My Signs, and slacken not, either of you, in keeping Me in remembrance.
"Go, both of you, to Pharaoh, for he has indeed transgressed all bounds;
"But speak to him mildly; perchance he may take warning or fear (God)."
They (Moses and Aaron) said: "Our Lord! We fear lest he hasten with insolence against us, or lest he transgress all bounds."
He said: "Fear not: for I am with you: I hear and see (everything).
"So go ye both to him, and say, 'Verily we are apostles sent by thy Lord: Send forth, therefore, the Children of Israel with us, and afflict them not: with a Sign, indeed, have we come from thy Lord! and peace to all who follow guidance!
"'Verily it has been revealed to us that the Penalty (awaits) those who reject and turn away.'"
(When this message was delivered), (Pharaoh) said: "Who, then, O Moses, is the Lord of you two?"
He said: "Our Lord is He Who gave to each (created) thing its form and nature, and further, gave (it) guidance."
(Pharaoh) said: "What then is the condition of previous generations?"
He replied: "The knowledge of that is with my Lord, duly recorded: my Lord never errs, nor forgets,-
"He Who has, made for you the earth like a carpet spread out; has enabled you to go about therein by roads (and channels); and has sent down water from the sky." With it have We produced diverse pairs of plants each separate from the others.
Eat (for yourselves) and pasture your cattle: verily, in this are Signs for men endued with understanding.
From the (earth) did We create you, and into it shall We return you, and from it shall We bring you out once again.
And We showed Pharaoh all Our Signs, but he did reject and refuse.
He said: "Hast thou come to drive us out of our land with thy magic, O Moses?
"But we can surely produce magic to match thine! So make a tryst between us and thee, which we shall not fail to keep - neither we nor thou - in a place where both shall have even chances."
Moses said: "Your tryst is the Day of the Festival, and let the people be assembled when the sun is well up."
So Pharaoh withdrew: He concerted his plan, and then came (back).
Moses said to him: Woe to you! Forge not ye a lie against God, lest He destroy you (at once) utterly by chastisement: the forger must suffer frustration!"
So they disputed, one with another, over their affair, but they kept their talk secret.
They said: "These two are certainly (expert) magicians: their object is to drive you out from your land with their magic, and to do away with your most cherished institutions.
"Therefore concert your plan, and then assemble in (serried) ranks: He wins (all along) today who gains the upper hand."
They said: "O Moses! whether wilt thou that thou throw (first) or that we be the first to throw?"
He said, "Nay, throw ye first!" Then behold their ropes and their rods-so it seemed to him on account of their magic - began to be in lively motion!
So Moses conceived in his mind a (sort of) fear.
We said: "Fear not! for thou hast indeed the upper hand:
"Throw that which is in thy right hand: Quickly will it swallow up that which they have faked what they have faked is but a magician's trick: and the magician thrives not, (no matter) where he goes."
So the magicians were thrown down to prostration: they said, "We believe in the Lord of Aaron and Moses".
(Pharaoh) said: "Believe ye in Him before I give you permission? Surely this must be your leader, who has taught you magic! be sure I will cut off your hands and feet on opposite sides, and I will have you crucified on trunks of palm-trees: so shall ye know for certain, which of us can give the more severe and the more lasting punishment!"
They said: "Never shall we regard thee as more than the Clear Sings that have come to us, or than Him Who created us! so decree whatever thou desirest to decree: for thou canst only decree (touching) the life of this world.
"For us, we have believed in our Lord: may He forgive us our faults, and the magic to which thou didst compel us: for God is Best and Most Abiding."
Verily he who comes to his Lord as a sinner (at Judgment),- for him is Hell: therein shall he neither die nor live.
But such as come to Him as Believers who have worked righteous deeds,- for them are ranks exalted,-
Gardens of Eternity, beneath which flow rivers: they will dwell therein for aye: such is the reward of those who purify themselves (from evil).
We sent an inspiration to Moses: "Travel by night with My servants, and strike a dry path for them through the sea, without fear of being overtaken (by Pharaoh) and without (any other) fear."
Then Pharaoh pursued them with his forces, but the waters completely overwhelmed them and covered them up.
Pharaoh led his people astray instead of leading them aright.
O ye Children of Israel! We delivered you from your enemy, and We made a Covenant with you on the right side of Mount (Sinai), and We sent down to you Manna and quails:
(Saying): "Eat of the good things We have provided for your sustenance, but commit no excess therein, lest My Wrath should justly descend on you: and those on whom descends My Wrath do perish indeed!
"But, without doubt, I am (also) He that forgives again and again, to those who repent, believe, and do right, who,- in fine, are ready to receive true guidance."
(When Moses was up on the Mount, God said:) "What made thee hasten in advance of thy people, O Moses?"
He replied: "Behold, they are close on my footsteps: I hastened to thee, O my Lord, to please thee."
(God) said: "We have tested thy people in thy absence: the Samiri has led them astray."
So Moses returned to his people in a state of indignation and sorrow. He said: "O my people! did not your Lord make a handsome promise to you? Did then the promise seem to you long (in coming)? Or did ye desire that Wrath should descend from your Lord on you, and so ye broke your promise to me?"
They said: "We broke not the promise to thee, as far as lay in our power: but we were made to carry the weight of the ornaments of the (whole) people, and we threw them (into the fire), and that was what the Samiri suggested.
"Then he brought out (of the fire) before the (people) the image of a calf: It seemed to low: so they said: This is your god, and the god of Moses, but (Moses) has forgotten!"
Could they not see that it could not return them a word (for answer), and that it had no power either to harm them or to do them good?
Aaron had already, before this said to them: "O my people! ye are being tested in this: for verily your Lord is (God) Most Gracious; so follow me and obey my command."
They had said: "We will not abandon this cult, but we will devote ourselves to it until Moses returns to us."
(Moses) said: "O Aaron! what kept thee back, when thou sawest them going wrong,
"From following me? Didst thou then disobey my order?"
(Aaron) replied: "O son of my mother! Seize (me) not by my beard nor by (the hair of) my head! Truly I feared lest thou shouldst say, 'Thou has caused a division among the children of Israel, and thou didst not respect my word!'"
(Moses) said: "What then is thy case, O Samiri?"
He replied: "I saw what they saw not: so I took a handful (of dust) from the footprint of the Apostle, and threw it (into the calf): thus did my soul suggest to me."
(Moses) said: "Get thee gone! but thy (punishment) in this life will be that thou wilt say, 'touch me not'; and moreover (for a future penalty) thou hast a promise that will not fail: Now look at thy god, of whom thou hast become a devoted worshipper: We will certainly (melt) it in a blazing fire and scatter it broadcast in the sea!"
But the god of you all is the One God: there is no god but He: all things He comprehends in His knowledge.
Thus do We relate to thee some stories of what happened before: for We have sent thee a Message from Our own Presence.
If any do turn away therefrom, verily they will bear a burden on the Day of judgment;
They will abide in this (state): and grievous will the burden be to them on that Day,-
The Day when the Trumpet will be sounded: that Day, We shall gather the sinful, blear-eyed (with terror).
In whispers will they consult each other: "Yet tarried not longer than ten (Days);
We know best what they will say, when their leader most eminent in conduct will say: "Ye tarried not longer than a day!"
They ask thee concerning the Mountains: say, "My Lord will uproot them and scatter them as dust;
"He will leave them as plains smooth and level;
"Nothing crooked or curved wilt thou see in their place."
On that Day will they follow the Caller (straight): no crookedness (can they show) him: all sounds shall humble themselves in the Presence of (God) Most Gracious: nothing shalt thou hear but the tramp of their feet (as they march).
On that Day shall no intercession avail except for those for whom permission has been granted by (God) Most Gracious and whose word is acceptable to Him.
He knows what (appears to His creatures as) before or after or behind them: but they shall not compass it with their knowledge.
(All) faces shall be humbled before (Him) - the Living, the Self-Subsisting, Eternal: hopeless indeed will be the man that carries iniquity (on his back).
But he who works deeds of righteousness, and has faith, will have no fear of harm nor of any curtailment (of what is his due).
Thus have We sent this down - an arabic Qur'an - and explained therein in detail some of the warnings, in order that they may fear God, or that it may cause their remembrance (of Him).
High above all is God, the King, the Truth! Be not in haste with the Qur'an before its revelation to thee is completed, but say, "O my Lord! advance me in knowledge."
We had already, beforehand, taken the covenant of Adam, but he forgot: and We found on his part no firm resolve.
When We said to the angels, "Prostrate yourselves to Adam", they prostrated themselves, but not Iblis: he refused.
Then We said: "O Adam! verily, this is an enemy to thee and thy wife: so let him not get you both out of the Garden, so that thou art landed in misery.
"There is therein (enough provision) for thee not to go hungry nor to go naked,
"Nor to suffer from thirst, nor from the sun's heat."
But Satan whispered evil to him: he said, "O Adam! shall I lead thee to the Tree of Eternity and to a kingdom that never decays?"
In the result, they both ate of the tree, and so their nakedness appeared to them: they began to sew together, for their covering, leaves from the Garden: thus did Adam disobey his Lord, and allow himself to be seduced.
But his Lord chose him (for His Grace): He turned to him, and gave him Guidance.
He said: "Get ye down, both of you,- all together, from the Garden, with enmity one to another: but if, as is sure, there comes to you Guidance from Me, whosoever follows My Guidance, will not lose his way, nor fall into misery.
"But whosoever turns away from My Message, verily for him is a life narrowed down, and We shall raise him up blind on the Day of Judgment."
He will say: "O my Lord! why hast Thou raised me up blind, while I had sight (before)?"
(God) will say: "Thus didst Thou, when Our Signs came unto thee, disregard them: so wilt thou, this day, be disregarded."
And thus do We recompense him who transgresses beyond bounds and believes not in the Sings of his Lord: and the Penalty of the Hereafter is far more grievous and more enduring.
Is it not a warning to such men (to call to mind) how many generations before them We destroyed, in whose haunts they (now) move? Verily, in this are Signs for men endued with understanding.
Had it not been for a Word that went forth before from thy Lord, (their punishment) must necessarily have come; but there is a Term appointed (for respite).
Therefore be patient with what they say, and celebrate (constantly) the praises of thy Lord, before the rising of the sun, and before its setting; yea, celebrate them for part of the hours of the night, and at the sides of the day: that thou mayest have (spiritual) joy.
Nor strain thine eyes in longing for the things We have given for enjoyment to parties of them, the splendour of the life of this world, through which We test them: but the provision of thy Lord is better and more enduring.
Enjoin prayer on thy people, and be constant therein. We ask thee not to provide sustenance: We provide it for thee. But the (fruit of) the Hereafter is for righteousness.
They say: "Why does he not bring us a sign from his Lord?" Has not a Clear Sign come to them of all that was in the former Books of revelation?
And if We had inflicted on them a penalty before this, they would have said: "Our Lord! If only Thou hadst sent us an apostle, we should certainly have followed Thy Signs before we were humbled and put to shame."
Say: "Each one (of us) is waiting: wait ye, therefore, and soon shall ye know who it is that is on the straight and even way, and who it is that has received Guidance."
Closer and closer to mankind comes their Reckoning: yet they heed not and they turn away.
Never comes (aught) to them of a renewed Message from their Lord, but they listen to it as in jest,-
Their hearts toying as with trifles. The wrong-doers conceal their private counsels, (saying), "Is this (one) more than a man like yourselves? Will ye go to witchcraft with your eyes open?"
Say: "My Lord knoweth (every) word (spoken) in the heavens and on earth: He is the One that heareth and knoweth (all things)."
"Nay," they say, "(these are) medleys of dream! - Nay, He forged it! - Nay, He is (but) a poet! Let him then bring us a Sign like the ones that were sent to (Prophets) of old!"
(As to those) before them, not one of the populations which We destroyed believed: will these believe?
Before thee, also, the apostles We sent were but men, to whom We granted inspiration: If ye realise this not, ask of those who possess the Message.
Nor did We give them bodies that ate no food, nor were they exempt from death.
In the end We fulfilled to them Our Promise, and We saved them and those whom We pleased, but We destroyed those who transgressed beyond bounds.
We have revealed for you (O men!) a book in which is a Message for you: will ye not then understand?
How many were the populations We utterly destroyed because of their iniquities, setting up in their places other peoples?
Yet, when they felt Our Punishment (coming), behold, they (tried to) flee from it.
Flee not, but return to the good things of this life which were given you, and to your homes in order that ye may be called to account.
They said: "Ah! woe to us! We were indeed wrong-doers!"
And that cry of theirs ceased not, till We made them as a field that is mown, as ashes silent and quenched.
Not for (idle) sport did We create the heavens and the earth and all that is between!
If it had been Our wish to take (just) a pastime, We should surely have taken it from the things nearest to Us, if We would do (such a thing)!
Nay, We hurl the Truth against falsehood, and it knocks out its brain, and behold, falsehood doth perish! Ah! woe be to you for the (false) things ye ascribe (to Us).
To Him belong all (creatures) in the heavens and on earth: Even those who are in His (very) Presence are not too proud to serve Him, nor are they (ever) weary (of His service):
They celebrate His praises night and day, nor do they ever flag or intermit.
Or have they taken (for worship) gods from the earth who can raise (the dead)?
If there were, in the heavens and the earth, other gods besides God, there would have been confusion in both! but glory to God, the Lord of the Throne: (High is He) above what they attribute to Him!
He cannot be questioned for His acts, but they will be questioned (for theirs).
Or have they taken for worship (other) gods besides him? Say, "Bring your convincing proof: this is the Message of those with me and the Message of those before me." But most of them know not the Truth, and so turn away.
Not an apostle did We send before thee without this inspiration sent by Us to him: that there is no god but I; therefore worship and serve Me.
And they say: "(God) Most Gracious has begotten offspring." Glory to Him! they are (but) servants raised to honour.
They speak not before He speaks, and they act (in all things) by His Command.
He knows what is before them, and what is behind them, and they offer no intercession except for those who are acceptable, and they stand in awe and reverence of His (Glory).
If any of them should say, "I am a god besides Him", such a one We should reward with Hell: thus do We reward those who do wrong.
Do not the Unbelievers see that the heavens and the earth were joined together (as one unit of creation), before we clove them asunder? We made from water every living thing. Will they not then believe?
And We have set on the earth mountains standing firm, lest it should shake with them, and We have made therein broad highways (between mountains) for them to pass through: that they may receive Guidance.
And We have made the heavens as a canopy well guarded: yet do they turn away from the Signs which these things (point to)!
It is He Who created the Night and the Day, and the sun and the moon: all (the celestial bodies) swim along, each in its rounded course.
We granted not to any man before thee permanent life (here): if then thou shouldst die, would they live permanently?
Every soul shall have a taste of death: and We test you by evil and by good by way of trial. to Us must ye return.
When the Unbelievers see thee, they treat thee not except with ridicule. "Is this," (they say), "the one who talks of your gods?" and they blaspheme at the mention of (God) Most Gracious!
Man is a creature of haste: soon (enough) will I show you My Signs; then ye will not ask Me to hasten them!
They say: "When will this promise come to pass, if ye are telling the truth?"
If only the Unbelievers knew (the time) when they will not be able to ward off the fire from their faces, nor yet from their backs, and (when) no help can reach them!
Nay, it may come to them all of a sudden and confound them: no power will they have then to avert it, nor will they (then) get respite.
Mocked were (many) apostle before thee; But their scoffers were hemmed in by the thing that they mocked.
Say: "Who can keep you safe by night and by day from (the Wrath of) (God) Most Gracious?" Yet they turn away from the mention of their Lord.
Or have they gods that can guard them from Us? They have no power to aid themselves, nor can they be defended from Us.
Nay, We gave the good things of this life to these men and their fathers until the period grew long for them; See they not that We gradually reduce the land (in their control) from its outlying borders? Is it then they who will win?
Say, "I do but warn you according to revelation": But the deaf will not hear the call, (even) when they are warned!
If but a breath of the Wrath of thy Lord do touch them, they will then say, "Woe to us! we did wrong indeed!"
We shall set up scales of justice for the Day of Judgment, so that not a soul will be dealt with unjustly in the least, and if there be (no more than) the weight of a mustard seed, We will bring it (to account): and enough are We to take account.
In the past We granted to Moses and Aaron the criterion (for judgment), and a Light and a Message for those who would do right,-
Those who fear their Lord in their most secret thoughts, and who hold the Hour (of Judgment) in awe.
And this is a blessed Message which We have sent down: will ye then reject it?
We bestowed aforetime on Abraham his rectitude of conduct, and well were We acquainted with him.
Behold! he said to his father and his people, "What are these images, to which ye are (so assiduously) devoted?"
They said, "We found our fathers worshipping them."
He said, "Indeed ye have been in manifest error - ye and your fathers."
They said, "Have you brought us the Truth, or are you one of those who jest?"
He said, "Nay, your Lord is the Lord of the heavens and the earth, He Who created them (from nothing): and I am a witness to this (Truth).
"And by God, I have a plan for your idols - after ye go away and turn your backs"..
So he broke them to pieces, (all) but the biggest of them, that they might turn (and address themselves) to it.
They said, "Who has done this to our gods? He must indeed be some man of impiety!"
They said, "We heard a youth talk of them: He is called Abraham."
They said, "Then bring him before the eyes of the people, that they may bear witness."
They said, "Art thou the one that did this with our gods, O Abraham?"
He said: "Nay, this was done by - this is their biggest one! ask them, if they can speak intelligently!"
So they turned to themselves and said, "Surely ye are the ones in the wrong!"
Then were they confounded with shame: (they said), "Thou knowest full well that these (idols) do not speak!"
(Abraham) said, "Do ye then worship, besides God, things that can neither be of any good to you nor do you harm?
"Fie upon you, and upon the things that ye worship besides God! Have ye no sense?"..
They said, "Burn him and protect your gods, If ye do (anything at all)!"
We said, "O Fire! be thou cool, and (a means of) safety for Abraham!"
Then they sought a stratagem against him: but We made them the ones that lost most!
But We delivered him and (his nephew) Lut (and directed them) to the land which We have blessed for the nations.
And We bestowed on him Isaac and, as an additional gift, (a grandson), Jacob, and We made righteous men of every one (of them).
And We made them leaders, guiding (men) by Our Command, and We sent them inspiration to do good deeds, to establish regular prayers, and to practise regular charity; and they constantly served Us (and Us only).
And to Lut, too, We gave Judgment and Knowledge, and We saved him from the town which practised abominations: truly they were a people given to Evil, a rebellious people.
And We admitted him to Our Mercy: for he was one of the Righteous.
(Remember) Noah, when he cried (to Us) aforetime: We listened to his (prayer) and delivered him and his family from great distress.
We helped him against people who rejected Our Signs: truly they were a people given to Evil: so We drowned them (in the Flood) all together.
And remember David and Solomon, when they gave judgment in the matter of the field into which the sheep of certain people had strayed by night: We did witness their judgment.
To Solomon We inspired the (right) understanding of the matter: to each (of them) We gave Judgment and Knowledge; it was Our power that made the hills and the birds celebrate Our praises, with David: it was We Who did (all these things).
It was We Who taught him the making of coats of mail for your benefit, to guard you from each other's violence: will ye then be grateful?
(It was Our power that made) the violent (unruly) wind flow (tamely) for Solomon, to his order, to the land which We had blessed: for We do know all things.
And of the evil ones, were some who dived for him, and did other work besides; and it was We Who guarded them.
And (remember) Job, when He cried to his Lord, "Truly distress has seized me, but Thou art the Most Merciful of those that are merciful."
So We listened to him: We removed the distress that was on him, and We restored his people to him, and doubled their number,- as a Grace from Ourselves, and a thing for commemoration, for all who serve Us.
And (remember) Isma'il, Idris, and Zul-kifl, all (men) of constancy and patience;
We admitted them to Our mercy: for they were of the righteous ones.
And remember Zun-nun, when he departed in wrath: He imagined that We had no power over him! But he cried through the deptHs of darkness, "There is no god but thou: glory to thee: I was indeed wrong!"
So We listened to him: and delivered him from distress: and thus do We deliver those who have faith.
And (remember) Zakariya, when he cried to his Lord: "O my Lord! leave me not without offspring, though thou art the best of inheritors."
So We listened to him: and We granted him Yahya: We cured his wife's (Barrenness) for him. These (three) were ever quick in emulation in good works; they used to call on Us with love and reverence, and humble themselves before Us.
And (remember) her who guarded her chastity: We breathed into her of Our spirit, and We made her and her son a sign for all peoples.
Verily, this brotherhood of yours is a single brotherhood, and I am your Lord and Cherisher: therefore serve Me (and no other).
But (later generations) cut off their affair (of unity), one from another: (yet) will they all return to Us.
Whoever works any act of righteousness and has faith,- His endeavour will not be rejected: We shall record it in his favour.
But there is a ban on any population which We have destroyed: that they shall not return,
Until the Gog and Magog (people) are let through (their barrier), and they swiftly swarm from every hill.
Then will the true promise draw nigh (of fulfilment): then behold! the eyes of the Unbelievers will fixedly stare in horror: "Ah! Woe to us! we were indeed heedless of this; nay, we truly did wrong!"
Verily ye, (unbelievers), and the (false) gods that ye worship besides God, are (but) fuel for Hell! to it will ye (surely) come!
If these had been gods, they would not have got there! but each one will abide therein.
There, sobbing will be their lot, nor will they there hear (aught else).
Those for whom the good (record) from Us has gone before, will be removed far therefrom.
Not the slightest sound will they hear of Hell: what their souls desired, in that will they dwell.
The Great Terror will bring them no grief: but the angels will meet them (with mutual greetings): "This is your Day,- (the Day) that ye were promised."
The Day that We roll up the heavens like a scroll rolled up for books (completed),- even as We produced the first creation, so shall We produce a new one: a promise We have undertaken: truly shall We fulfil it.
Before this We wrote in the Psalms, after the Message (given to Moses): My servants the righteous, shall inherit the earth."
Verily in this (Qur'an) is a Message for people who would (truly) worship God.
We sent thee not, but as a Mercy for all creatures.
Say: "What has come to me by inspiration is that your God is One God: will ye therefore bow to His Will (in Islam)?"
But if they turn back, Say: "I have proclaimed the Message to you all alike and in truth; but I know not whether that which ye are promised is near or far.
"It is He Who knows what is open in speech and what ye hide (in your hearts).
"I know not but that it may be a trial for you, and a grant of (worldly) livelihood (to you) for a time."
Say: "O my Lord! judge Thou in truth!" "Our Lord Most Gracious is the One Whose assistance should be sought against the blasphemies ye utter!"
O mankind! fear your Lord! for the convulsion of the Hour (of Judgment) will be a thing terrible!
The Day ye shall see it, every mother giving suck shall forget her suckling- babe, and every pregnant female shall drop her load (unformed): thou shalt see mankind as in a drunken riot, yet not drunk: but dreadful will be the Wrath of God.
And yet among men there are such as dispute about God, without knowledge, and follow every evil one obstinate in rebellion!
About the (Evil One) it is decreed that whoever turns to him for friendship, him will he lead astray, and he will guide him to the Penalty of the Fire.
O mankind! if ye have a doubt about the Resurrection, (consider) that We created you out of dust, then out of sperm, then out of a leech-like clot, then out of a morsel of flesh, partly formed and partly unformed, in order that We may manifest (our power) to you; and We cause whom We will to rest in the wombs for an appointed term, then do We bring you out as babes, then (foster you) that ye may reach your age of full strength; and some of you are called to die, and some are sent back to the feeblest old age, so that they know nothing after having known (much), and (further), thou seest the earth barren and lifeless, but when We pour down rain on it, it is stirred (to life), it swells, and it puts forth every kind of beautiful growth (in pairs).
This is so, because God is the Reality: it is He Who gives life to the dead, and it is He Who has power over all things.
And verily the Hour will come: there can be no doubt about it, or about (the fact) that God will raise up all who are in the graves.
Yet there is among men such a one as disputes about God, without Knowledge, without Guidance, and without a Book of Enlightenment,-
(Disdainfully) bending his side, in order to lead (men) astray from the Path of God: for him there is disgrace in this life, and on the Day of Judgment We shall make him taste the Penalty of burning (Fire).
(It will be said): "This is because of the deeds which thy hands sent forth, for verily God is not unjust to His servants.
There are among men some who serve God, as it were, on the verge: if good befalls them, they are, therewith, well content; but if a trial comes to them, they turn on their faces: they lose both this world and the Hereafter: that is loss for all to see!
They call on such deities, besides God, as can neither hurt nor profit them: that is straying far indeed (from the Way)!
(Perhaps) they call on one whose hurt is nearer than his profit: evil, indeed, is the patron, and evil the companion (or help)!
Verily God will admit those who believe and work righteous deeds, to Gardens, beneath which rivers flow: for God carries out all that He plans.
If any think that God will not help him (His Apostle) in this world and the Hereafter, let him stretch out a rope to the ceiling and cut (himself) off: then let him see whether his plan will remove that which enrages (him)!
Thus have We sent down Clear Sings; and verily God doth guide whom He will!
Those who believe (in the Qur'an), those who follow the Jewish (scriptures), and the Sabians, Christians, Magians, and Polytheists,- God will judge between them on the Day of Judgment: for God is witness of all things.
Seest thou not that to God bow down in worship all things that are in the heavens and on earth,- the sun, the moon, the stars; the hills, the trees, the animals; and a great number among mankind? But a great number are (also) such as are fit for Punishment: and such as God shall disgrace,- None can raise to honour: for God carries out all that He wills.
These two antagonists dispute with each other about their Lord: But those who deny (their Lord),- for them will be cut out a garment of Fire: over their heads will be poured out boiling water.
With it will be scalded what is within their bodies, as well as (their) skins.
In addition there will be maces of iron (to punish) them.
Every time they wish to get away therefrom, from anguish, they will be forced back therein, and (it will be said), "Taste ye the Penalty of Burning!"
God will admit those who believe and work righteous deeds, to Gardens beneath which rivers flow: they shall be adorned therein with bracelets of gold and pearls; and their garments there will be of silk.
For they have been guided (in this life) to the purest of speeches; they have been guided to the Path of Him Who is Worthy of (all) Praise.
As to those who have rejected (God), and would keep back (men) from the Way of God, and from the Sacred Mosque, which We have made (open) to (all) men - equal is the dweller there and the visitor from the country - and any whose purpose therein is profanity or wrong-doing - them will We cause to taste of a most Grievous Penalty.
Behold! We gave the site, to Abraham, of the (Sacred) House, (saying): "Associate not anything (in worship) with Me; and sanctify My House for those who compass it round, or stand up, or bow, or prostrate themselves (therein in prayer).
"And proclaim the Pilgrimage among men: they will come to thee on foot and (mounted) on every kind of camel, lean on account of journeys through deep and distant mountain highways;
"That they may witness the benefits (provided) for them, and celebrate the name of God, through the Days appointed, over the cattle which He has provided for them (for sacrifice): then eat ye thereof and feed the distressed ones in want.
"Then let them complete the rites prescribed for them, perform their vows, and (again) circumambulate the Ancient House."
Such (is the Pilgrimage): whoever honours the sacred rites of God, for him it is good in the Sight of his Lord. Lawful to you (for food in Pilgrimage) are cattle, except those mentioned to you (as exception): but shun the abomination of idols, and shun the word that is false,-
Being true in faith to God, and never assigning partners to Him: if anyone assigns partners to God, is as if he had fallen from heaven and been snatched up by birds, or the wind had swooped (like a bird on its prey) and thrown him into a far- distant place.
Such (is his state): and whoever holds in honour the symbols of God, (in the sacrifice of animals), such (honour) should come truly from piety of heart.
In them ye have benefits for a term appointed: in the end their place of sacrifice is near the Ancient House.
To every people did We appoint rites (of sacrifice), that they might celebrate the name of God over the sustenance He gave them from animals (fit for food). But your God is One God: submit then your wills to Him (in Islam): and give thou the good news to those who humble themselves,-
To those whose hearts when God is mentioned, are filled with fear, who show patient perseverance over their afflictions, keep up regular prayer, and spend (in charity) out of what We have bestowed upon them.
The sacrificial camels we have made for you as among the symbols from God: in them is (much) good for you: then pronounce the name of God over them as they line up (for sacrifice): when they are down on their sides (after slaughter), eat ye thereof, and feed such as (beg not but) live in contentment, and such as beg with due humility: thus have We made animals subject to you, that ye may be grateful.
It is not their meat nor their blood, that reaches God: it is your piety that reaches Him: He has thus made them subject to you, that ye may glorify God for His Guidance to you and proclaim the good news to all who do right.
Verily God will defend (from ill) those who believe: verily, God loveth not any that is a traitor to faith, or show ingratitude.
To those against whom war is made, permission is given (to fight), because they are wronged;- and verily, God is most powerful for their aid;-
(They are) those who have been expelled from their homes in defiance of right,- (for no cause) except that they say, "our Lord is God". Did not God check one set of people by means of another, there would surely have been pulled down monasteries, churches, synagogues, and mosques, in which the name of God is commemorated in abundant measure. God will certainly aid those who aid his (cause);- for verily God is full of Strength, Exalted in Might, (able to enforce His Will).
(They are) those who, if We establish them in the land, establish regular prayer and give regular charity, enjoin the right and forbid wrong: with God rests the end (and decision) of (all) affairs.
If they treat thy (mission) as false, so did the peoples before them (with their prophets),- the People of Noah, and 'Ad and Thamud;
Those of Abraham and Lut;
And the Companions of the Madyan People; and Moses was rejected (in the same way). But I granted respite to the Unbelievers, and (only) after that did I punish them: but how (terrible) was my rejection (of them)!
How many populations have We destroyed, which were given to wrong- doing? They tumbled down on their roofs. And how many wells are lying idle and neglected, and castles lofty and well-built?
Do they not travel through the land, so that their hearts (and minds) may thus learn wisdom and their ears may thus learn to hear? Truly it is not their eyes that are blind, but their hearts which are in their breasts.
Yet they ask thee to hasten on the Punishment! But God will not fail in His Promise. Verily a Day in the sight of thy Lord is like a thousand years of your reckoning.
And to how many populations did I give respite, which were given to wrong-doing? in the end I punished them. To me is the destination (of all).
Say: "O men! I am (sent) to you only to give a Clear Warning:
"Those who believe and work righteousness, for them is forgiveness and a sustenance most generous.
"But those who strive against Our Signs, to frustrate them,- they will be Companions of the Fire."
Never did We send an apostle or a prophet before thee, but, when he framed a desire, Satan threw some (vanity) into his desire: but God will cancel anything (vain) that Satan throws in, and God will confirm (and establish) His Signs: for God is full of Knowledge and Wisdom:
That He may make the suggestions thrown in by Satan, but a trial for those in whose hearts is a disease and who are hardened of heart: verily the wrong-doers are in a schism far (from the Truth):
And that those on whom knowledge has been bestowed may learn that the (Qur'an) is the Truth from thy Lord, and that they may believe therein, and their hearts may be made humbly (open) to it: for verily God is the Guide of those who believe, to the Straight Way.
Those who reject Faith will not cease to be in doubt concerning (Revelation) until the Hour (of Judgment) comes suddenly upon them, or there comes to them the Penalty of a Day of Disaster.
On that Day of Dominion will be that of God: He will judge between them: so those who believe and work righteous deeds will be in Gardens of Delight.
And for those who reject Faith and deny our Signs, there will be a humiliating Punishment.
Those who leave their homes in the cause of God, and are then slain or die,- On them will God bestow verily a goodly Provision: Truly God is He Who bestows the best provision.
Verily He will admit them to a place with which they shall be well pleased: for God is All-Knowing, Most Forbearing.
That (is so). And if one has retaliated to no greater extent than the injury he received, and is again set upon inordinately, God will help him: for God is One that blots out (sins) and forgives (again and again).
That is because God merges night into day, and He merges day into night, and verily it is God Who hears and sees (all things).
That is because God - He is the Reality; and those besides Him whom they invoke,- they are but vain Falsehood: verily God is He, Most High, Most Great.
Seest thou not that God sends down rain from the sky, and forthwith the earth becomes clothed with green? for God is He Who understands the finest mysteries, and is well-acquainted (with them).
To Him belongs all that is in the heavens and on earth: for verily God,- He is free of all wants, Worthy of all Praise.
Seest thou not that God has made subject to you (men) all that is on the earth, and the ships that sail through the sea by His Command? He withholds the sky (rain) from failing on the earth except by His leave: for God is Most Kind and Most Merciful to man.
It is He Who gave you life, will cause you to die, and will again give you life: Truly man is a most ungrateful creature!
To every People have We appointed rites and ceremonies which they must follow: let them not then dispute with thee on the matter, but do thou invite (them) to thy Lord: for thou art assuredly on the Right Way.
If they do wrangle with thee, say, "God knows best what it is ye are doing."
"God will judge between you on the Day of Judgment concerning the matters in which ye differ."
Knowest thou not that God knows all that is in heaven and on earth? Indeed it is all in a Record, and that is easy for God.
Yet they worship, besides God, things for which no authority has been sent down to them, and of which they have (really) no knowledge: for those that do wrong there is no helper.
When Our Clear Signs are rehearsed to them, thou wilt notice a denial on the faces of the Unbelievers! they nearly attack with violence those who rehearse Our Signs to them. Say, "Shall I tell you of something (far) worse than these Signs? It is the Fire (of Hell)! God has promised it to the Unbelievers! and evil is that destination!"
O men! Here is a parable set forth! listen to it! Those on whom, besides God, ye call, cannot create (even) a fly, if they all met together for the purpose! and if the fly should snatch away anything from them, they would have no power to release it from the fly. Feeble are those who petition and those whom they petition!
No just estimate have they made of God: for God is He Who is strong and able to Carry out His Will.
God chooses messengers from angels and from men for God is He Who hears and sees (all things).
He knows what is before them and what is behind them: and to God go back all questions (for decision).
O ye who believe! bow down, prostrate yourselves, and adore your Lord; and do good; that ye may prosper.
And strive in His cause as ye ought to strive, (with sincerity and under discipline). He has chosen you, and has imposed no difficulties on you in religion; it is the cult of your father Abraham. It is He Who has named you Muslims, both before and in this (Revelation); that the Apostle may be a witness for you, and ye be witnesses for mankind! So establish regular Prayer, give regular Charity, and hold fast to God! He is your Protector - the Best to protect and the Best to help!
The believers must (eventually) win through,-
Those who humble themselves in their prayers;
Who avoid vain talk;
Who are active in deeds of charity;
Who abstain from sex,
Except with those joined to them in the marriage bond, or (the captives) whom their right hands possess,- for (in their case) they are free from blame,
But those whose desires exceed those limits are transgressors;-
Those who faithfully observe their trusts and their covenants;
And who (strictly) guard their prayers;-
These will be the heirs,
Who will inherit Paradise: they will dwell therein (for ever).
Man We did create from a quintessence (of clay);
Then We placed him as (a drop of) sperm in a place of rest, firmly fixed;
Then We made the sperm into a clot of congealed blood; then of that clot We made a (foetus) lump; then we made out of that lump bones and clothed the bones with flesh; then we developed out of it another creature. So blessed be God, the best to create!
After that, at length ye will die
Again, on the Day of Judgment, will ye be raised up.
And We have made, above you, seven tracts; and We are never unmindful of (our) Creation.
And We send down water from the sky according to (due) measure, and We cause it to soak in the soil; and We certainly are able to drain it off (with ease).
With it We grow for you gardens of date-palms and vines: in them have ye abundant fruits: and of them ye eat (and have enjoyment),-
Also a tree springing out of Mount Sinai, which produces oil, and relish for those who use it for food.
And in cattle (too) ye have an instructive example: from within their bodies We produce (milk) for you to drink; there are, in them, (besides), numerous (other) benefits for you; and of their (meat) ye eat;
An on them, as well as in slips, ye side.
(Further, We sent a long line of prophets for your instruction). We sent Noah to his people: He said, "O my people! worship God! Ye have no other god but Him. Will ye not fear (Him)?"
The chiefs of the Unbelievers among his people said: "He is no more than a man like yourselves: his wish is to assert his superiority over you: if God had wished (to send messengers), He could have sent down angels; never did we hear such a thing (as he says), among our ancestors of old."
(And some said): "He is only a man possessed: wait (and have patience) with him for a time."
(Noah) said: "O my Lord! help me: for that they accuse me of falsehood!"
So We inspired him (with this message): "Construct the Ark within Our sight and under Our guidance: then when comes Our Command, and the fountains of the earth gush forth, take thou on board pairs of every species, male and female, and thy family- except those of them against whom the Word has already gone forth: And address Me not in favour of the wrong-doers; for they shall be drowned (in the Flood).
And when thou hast embarked on the Ark - thou and those with thee,- say: "Praise be to God, Who has saved us from the people who do wrong."
And say: "O my Lord! enable me to disembark with thy blessing: for Thou art the Best to enable (us) to disembark."
Verily in this there are Signs (for men to understand); (thus) do We try (men).
Then We raised after them another generation.
And We sent to them an apostle from among themselves, (saying), "Worship God! ye have no other god but Him. Will ye not fear (Him)?"
And the chiefs of his people, who disbelieved and denied the Meeting in the Hereafter, and on whom We had bestowed the good things of this life, said: "He is no more than a man like yourselves: he eats of that of which ye eat, and drinks of what ye drink.
"If ye obey a man like yourselves, behold, it is certain ye will be lost.
"Does he promise that when ye die and become dust and bones, ye shall be brought forth (again)?
"Far, very far is that which ye are promised!
"There is nothing but our life in this world! We shall die and we live! But we shall never be raised up again!
"He is only a man who invents a lie against God, but we are not the ones to believe in him!"
(The prophet) said: "O my Lord! help me: for that they accuse me of falsehood."
(God) said: "In but a little while, they are sure to be sorry!"
Then the Blast overtook them with justice, and We made them as rubbish of dead leaves (floating on the stream of Time)! So away with the people who do wrong!
Then We raised after them other generations.
No people can hasten their term, nor can they delay (it).
Then sent We our apostles in succession: every time there came to a people their apostle, they accused him of falsehood: so We made them follow each other (in punishment): We made them as a tale (that is told): So away with a people that will not believe!
Then We sent Moses and his brother Aaron, with Our Signs and authority manifest,
To Pharaoh and his Chiefs: But these behaved insolently: they were an arrogant people.
They said: "Shall we believe in two men like ourselves? And their people are subject to us!"
So they accused them of falsehood, and they became of those who were destroyed.
And We gave Moses the Book, in order that they might receive guidance.
And We made the son of Mary and his mother as a Sign: We gave them both shelter on high ground, affording rest and security and furnished with springs.
O ye apostles! enjoy (all) things good and pure, and work righteousness: for I am well-acquainted with (all) that ye do.
And verily this Brotherhood of yours is a single Brotherhood, and I am your Lord and Cherisher: therefore fear Me (and no other).
But people have cut off their affair (of unity), between them, into sects: each party rejoices in that which is with itself.
But leave them in their confused ignorance for a time.
Do they think that because We have granted them abundance of wealth and sons,
We would hasten them on in every good? Nay, they do not understand.
Verily those who live in awe for fear of their Lord;
Those who believe in the Signs of their Lord;
Those who join not (in worship) partners with their Lord;
And those who dispense their charity with their hearts full of fear, because they will return to their Lord;-
It is these who hasten in every good work, and these who are foremost in them.
On no soul do We place a burden greater than it can bear: before Us is a record which clearly shows the truth: they will never be wronged.
But their hearts are in confused ignorance of this; and there are, besides that, deeds of theirs, which they will (continue) to do,-
Until, when We seize in Punishment those of them who received the good things of this world, behold, they will groan in supplication!
(It will be said): "Groan not in supplication this day: for ye shall certainly not be helped by Us.
"My Signs used to be rehearsed to you, but ye used to turn back on your heels-
"In arrogance: talking nonsense about the (Qur'an), like one telling fables by night."
Do they not ponder over the Word (of God), or has anything (new) come to them that did not come to their fathers of old?
Or do they not recognise their Apostle, that they deny him?
Or do they say, "He is possessed"? Nay, he has brought them the Truth, but most of them hate the Truth.
If the Truth had been in accord with their desires, truly the heavens and the earth, and all beings therein would have been in confusion and corruption! Nay, We have sent them their admonition, but they turn away from their admonition.
Or is it that thou askest them for some recompense? But the recompense of thy Lord is best: He is the Best of those who give sustenance.
But verily thou callest them to the Straight Way;
And verily those who believe not in the Hereafter are deviating from that Way.
If We had mercy on them and removed the distress which is on them, they would obstinately persist in their transgression, wandering in distraction to and fro.
We inflicted Punishment on them, but they humbled not themselves to their Lord, nor do they submissively entreat (Him)!-
Until We open on them a gate leading to a severe Punishment: then Lo! they will be plunged in despair therein!
It is He Who has created for you (the faculties of) hearing, sight, feeling and understanding: little thanks it is ye give!
And He has multiplied you through the earth, and to Him shall ye be gathered back.
It is He Who gives life and death, and to Him (is due) the alternation of Night and Day: will ye not then understand?
On the contrary they say things similar to what the ancients said.
They say: "What! when we die and become dust and bones, could we really be raised up again?
"Such things have been promised to us and to our fathers before! they are nothing but tales of the ancients!"
Say: "To whom belong the earth and all beings therein? (say) if ye know!"
They will say, "To God!" say: "Yet will ye not receive admonition?"
Say: "Who is the Lord of the seven heavens, and the Lord of the Throne (of Glory) Supreme?"
They will say, "(They belong) to God." Say: "Will ye not then be filled with awe?"
Say: "Who is it in whose hands is the governance of all things,- who protects (all), but is not protected (of any)? (say) if ye know."
They will say, "(It belongs) to God." Say: "Then how are ye deluded?"
We have sent them the Truth: but they indeed practise falsehood!
No son did God beget, nor is there any god along with Him: (if there were many gods), behold, each god would have taken away what he had created, and some would have lorded it over others! Glory to God! (He is free) from the (sort of) things they attribute to Him!
He knows what is hidden and what is open: too high is He for the partners they attribute to Him!
Say: "O my Lord! if Thou wilt show me (in my lifetime) that which they are warned against,-
"Then, O my Lord! put me not amongst the people who do wrong!"
And We are certainly able to show thee (in fulfilment) that against which they are warned.
Repel evil with that which is best: We are well acquainted with the things they say.
And say "O my Lord! I seek refuge with Thee from the suggestions of the Evil Ones.
"And I seek refuge with Thee O my Lord! lest they should come near me."
(In Falsehood will they be) Until, when death comes to one of them, he says: "O my Lord! send me back (to life),-
"In order that I may work righteousness in the things I neglected." - "By no means! It is but a word he says."- Before them is a Partition till the Day they are raised up.
Then when the Trumpet is blown, there will be no more relationships between them that Day, nor will one ask after another!
Then those whose balance (of good deeds) is heavy,- they will attain salvation:
But those whose balance is light, will be those who have lost their souls, in Hell will they abide.
The Fire will burn their faces, and they will therein grin, with their lips displaced.
"Were not My Signs rehearsed to you, and ye did but treat them as falsehood?"
They will say: "our Lord! Our misfortune overwhelmed us, and we became a people astray!
"Our Lord! bring us out of this: if ever we return (to Evil), then shall we be wrong-doers indeed!"
He will say: "Be ye driven into it (with ignominy)! And speak ye not to Me!
"A part of My servants there was, who used to pray 'our Lord! we believe; then do Thou forgive us, and have mercy upon us: For Thou art the Best of those who show mercy!"
"But ye treated them with ridicule, so much so that (ridicule of) them made you forget My Message while ye were laughing at them!
"I have rewarded them this Day for their patience and constancy: they are indeed the ones that have achieved Bliss..."
He will say: "What number of years did ye stay on earth?"
They will say: "We stayed a day or part of a day: but ask those who keep account."
He will say: "Ye stayed not but a little,- if ye had only known!
"Did ye then think that We had created you in jest, and that ye would not be brought back to Us (for account)?"
Therefore exalted be God, the King, the Reality: there is no god but He, the Lord of the Throne of Honour!
If anyone invokes, besides God, Any other god, he has no authority therefor; and his reckoning will be only with his Lord! and verily the Unbelievers will fail to win through!
So say: "O my Lord! grant Thou forgiveness and mercy for Thou art the Best of those who show mercy!"
A sura which We have sent down and which We have ordained in it have We sent down Clear Signs, in order that ye may receive admonition.
The woman and the man guilty of adultery or fornication,- flog each of them with a hundred stripes: Let not compassion move you in their case, in a matter prescribed by God, if ye believe in God and the Last Day: and let a party of the Believers witness their punishment.
Let no man guilty of adultery or fornication marry and but a woman similarly guilty, or an Unbeliever: nor let any but such a man or an Unbeliever marry such a woman: to the Believers such a thing is forbidden.
And those who launch a charge against chaste women, and produce not four witnesses (to support their allegations),- flog them with eighty stripes; and reject their evidence ever after: for such men are wicked transgressors;-
Unless they repent thereafter and mend (their conduct); for God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
And for those who launch a charge against their spouses, and have (in support) no evidence but their own,- their solitary evidence (can be received) if they bear witness four times (with an oath) by God that they are solemnly telling the truth;
And the fifth (oath) (should be) that they solemnly invoke the curse of God on themselves if they tell a lie.
But it would avert the punishment from the wife, if she bears witness four times (with an oath) By God, that (her husband) is telling a lie;
And the fifth (oath) should be that she solemnly invokes the wrath of God on herself if (her accuser) is telling the truth.
If it were not for God's grace and mercy on you, and that God is Oft- Returning, full of Wisdom,- (Ye would be ruined indeed).
Those who brought forward the lie are a body among yourselves: think it not to be an evil to you; On the contrary it is good for you: to every man among them (will come the punishment) of the sin that he earned, and to him who took on himself the lead among them, will be a penalty grievous.
Why did not the believers - men and women - when ye heard of the affair,- put the best construction on it in their own minds and say, "This (charge) is an obvious lie" ?
Why did they not bring four witnesses to prove it? When they have not brought the witnesses, such men, in the sight of God, (stand forth) themselves as liars!
Were it not for the grace and mercy of God on you, in this world and the Hereafter, a grievous penalty would have seized you in that ye rushed glibly into this affair.
Behold, ye received it on your tongues, and said out of your mouths things of which ye had no knowledge; and ye thought it to be a light matter, while it was most serious in the sight of God.
And why did ye not, when ye heard it, say? - "It is not right of us to speak of this: Glory to God! this is a most serious slander!"
God doth admonish you, that ye may never repeat such (conduct), if ye are (true) Believers.
And God makes the Signs plain to you: for God is full of knowledge and wisdom.
Those who love (to see) scandal published broadcast among the Believers, will have a grievous Penalty in this life and in the Hereafter: God knows, and ye know not.
Were it not for the grace and mercy of God on you, and that God is full of kindness and mercy, (ye would be ruined indeed).
O ye who believe! follow not Satan's footsteps: if any will follow the footsteps of Satan, he will (but) command what is shameful and wrong: and were it not for the grace and mercy of God on you, not one of you would ever have been pure: but God doth purify whom He pleases: and God is One Who hears and knows (all things).
Let not those among you who are endued with grace and amplitude of means resolve by oath against helping their kinsmen, those in want, and those who have left their homes in God's cause: let them forgive and overlook, do you not wish that God should forgive you? For God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Those who slander chaste women, indiscreet but believing, are cursed in this life and in the Hereafter: for them is a grievous Penalty,-
On the Day when their tongues, their hands, and their feet will bear witness against them as to their actions.
On that Day God will pay them back (all) their just dues, and they will realise that God is the (very) Truth, that makes all things manifest.
Women impure are for men impure, and men impure for women impure and women of purity are for men of purity, and men of purity are for women of purity: these are not affected by what people say: for them there is forgiveness, and a provision honourable.
O ye who believe! enter not houses other than your own, until ye have asked permission and saluted those in them: that is best for you, in order that ye may heed (what is seemly).
If ye find no one in the house, enter not until permission is given to you: if ye are asked to go back, go back: that makes for greater purity for yourselves: and God knows well all that ye do.
It is no fault on your part to enter houses not used for living in, which serve some (other) use for you: And God has knowledge of what ye reveal and what ye conceal.
Say to the believing men that they should lower their gaze and guard their modesty: that will make for greater purity for them: And God is well acquainted with all that they do.
And say to the believing women that they should lower their gaze and guard their modesty; that they should not display their beauty and ornaments except what (must ordinarily) appear thereof; that they should draw their veils over their bosoms and not display their beauty except to their husbands, their fathers, their husband's fathers, their sons, their husbands' sons, their brothers or their brothers' sons, or their sisters' sons, or their women, or the slaves whom their right hands possess, or male servants free of physical needs, or small children who have no sense of the shame of sex; and that they should not strike their feet in order to draw attention to their hidden ornaments. And O ye Believers! turn ye all together towards God, that ye may attain Bliss.
Marry those among you who are single, or the virtuous ones among yourselves, male or female: if they are in poverty, God will give them means out of His grace: for God encompasseth all, and he knoweth all things.
Let those who find not the wherewithal for marriage keep themselves chaste, until God gives them means out of His grace. And if any of your slaves ask for a deed in writing (to enable them to earn their freedom for a certain sum), give them such a deed if ye know any good in them: yea, give them something yourselves out of the means which God has given to you. But force not your maids to prostitution when they desire chastity, in order that ye may make a gain in the goods of this life. But if anyone compels them, yet, after such compulsion, is God, Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful (to them),
We have already sent down to you verses making things clear, an illustration from (the story of) people who passed away before you, and an admonition for those who fear (God).
God is the Light of the heavens and the earth. The Parable of His Light is as if there were a Niche and within it a Lamp: the Lamp enclosed in Glass: the glass as it were a brilliant star: Lit from a blessed Tree, an Olive, neither of the east nor of the west, whose oil is well-nigh luminous, though fire scarce touched it: Light upon Light! God doth guide whom He will to His Light: God doth set forth Parables for men: and God doth know all things.
(Lit is such a Light) in houses, which God hath permitted to be raised to honour; for the celebration, in them, of His name: In them is He glorified in the mornings and in the evenings, (again and again),-
By men whom neither traffic nor merchandise can divert from the Remembrance of God, nor from regular Prayer, nor from the practice of regular Charity: Their (only) fear is for the Day when hearts and eyes will be transformed (in a world wholly new),-
That God may reward them according to the best of their deeds, and add even more for them out of His Grace: for God doth provide for those whom He will, without measure.
But the Unbelievers,- their deeds are like a mirage in sandy deserts, which the man parched with thirst mistakes for water; until when he comes up to it, he finds it to be nothing: But he finds God (ever) with him, and God will pay him his account: and God is swift in taking account.
Or (the Unbelievers' state) is like the depths of darkness in a vast deep ocean, overwhelmed with billow topped by billow, topped by (dark) clouds: depths of darkness, one above another: if a man stretches out his hands, he can hardly see it! for any to whom God giveth not light, there is no light!
Seest thou not that it is God Whose praises all beings in the heavens and on earth do celebrate, and the birds (of the air) with wings outspread? Each one knows its own (mode of) prayer and praise. And God knows well all that they do.
Yea, to God belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth; and to God is the final goal (of all).
Seest thou not that God makes the clouds move gently, then joins them together, then makes them into a heap? - then wilt thou see rain issue forth from their midst. And He sends down from the sky mountain masses (of clouds) wherein is hail: He strikes therewith whom He pleases and He turns it away from whom He pleases, the vivid flash of His lightning well-nigh blinds the sight.
It is God Who alternates the Night and the Day: verily in these things is an instructive example for those who have vision!
And God has created every animal from water: of them there are some that creep on their bellies; some that walk on two legs; and some that walk on four. God creates what He wills for verily God has power over all things.
We have indeed sent down signs that make things manifest: and God guides whom He wills to a way that is straight.
They say, "We believe in God and in the apostle, and we obey": but even after that, some of them turn away: they are not (really) Believers.
When they are summoned to God and His apostle, in order that He may judge between them, behold some of them decline (to come).
But if the right is on their side, they come to him with all submission.
Is it that there is a disease in their hearts? or do they doubt, or are they in fear, that God and His Apostle will deal unjustly with them? Nay, it is they themselves who do wrong.
The answer of the Believers, when summoned to God and His Apostle, in order that He may judge between them, is no other than this: they say, "We hear and we obey": it is such as these that will attain felicity.
It is such as obey God and His Apostle, and fear God and do right, that will win (in the end),
They swear their strongest oaths by God that, if only thou wouldst command them, they would leave (their homes). Say: "Swear ye not; Obedience is (more) reasonable; verily, God is well acquainted with all that ye do."
Say: "Obey God, and obey the Apostle: but if ye turn away, he is only responsible for the duty placed on him and ye for that placed on you. If ye obey him, ye shall be on right guidance. The Apostle's duty is only to preach the clear (Message).
God has promised, to those among you who believe and work righteous deeds, that He will, of a surety, grant them in the land, inheritance (of power), as He granted it to those before them; that He will establish in authority their religion - the one which He has chosen for them; and that He will change (their state), after the fear in which they (lived), to one of security and peace: 'They will worship Me (alone) and not associate aught with Me. 'If any do reject Faith after this, they are rebellious and wicked.
So establish regular Prayer and give regular Charity; and obey the Apostle; that ye may receive mercy.
Never think thou that the Unbelievers are going to frustrate (God's Plan) on earth: their abode is the Fire,- and it is indeed an evil refuge!
O ye who believe! let those whom your right hands possess, and the (children) among you who have not come of age ask your permission (before they come to your presence), on three occasions: before morning prayer; the while ye doff your clothes for the noonday heat; and after the late-night prayer: these are your three times of undress: outside those times it is not wrong for you or for them to move about attending to each other: Thus does God make clear the Signs to you: for God is full of knowledge and wisdom.
But when the children among you come of age, let them (also) ask for permission, as do those senior to them (in age): Thus does God make clear His Signs to you: for God is full of knowledge and wisdom.
Such elderly women as are past the prospect of marriage,- there is no blame on them if they lay aside their (outer) garments, provided they make not a wanton display of their beauty: but it is best for them to be modest: and God is One Who sees and knows all things.
It is no fault in the blind nor in one born lame, nor in one afflicted with illness, nor in yourselves, that ye should eat in your own houses, or those of your fathers, or your mothers, or your brothers, or your sisters, or your father's brothers or your father's sisters, or your mohter's brothers, or your mother's sisters, or in houses of which the keys are in your possession, or in the house of a sincere friend of yours: there is no blame on you, whether ye eat in company or separately. But if ye enter houses, salute each other - a greeting of blessing and purity as from God. Thus does God make clear the signs to you: that ye may understand.
Only those are believers, who believe in God and His Apostle: when they are with him on a matter requiring collective action, they do not depart until they have asked for his leave; those who ask for thy leave are those who believe in God and His Apostle; so when they ask for thy leave, for some business of theirs, give leave to those of them whom thou wilt, and ask God for their forgiveness: for God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Deem not the summons of the Apostle among yourselves like the summons of one of you to another: God doth know those of you who slip away under shelter of some excuse: then let those beware who withstand the Apostle's order, lest some trial befall them, or a grievous penalty be inflicted on them.
Be quite sure that to God doth belong whatever is in the heavens and on earth. Well doth He know what ye are intent upon: and one day they will be brought back to Him, and He will tell them the truth of what they did: for God doth know all things.
Blessed is He who sent down the criterion to His servant, that it may be an admonition to all creatures;-
He to whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth: no son has He begotten, nor has He a partner in His dominion: it is He who created all things, and ordered them in due proportions.
Yet have they taken, besides him, gods that can create nothing but are themselves created; that have no control of hurt or good to themselves; nor can they control death nor life nor resurrection.
But the misbelievers say: "Naught is this but a lie which he has forged, and others have helped him at it." In truth it is they who have put forward an iniquity and a falsehood.
And they say: "Tales of the ancients, which he has caused to be written: and they are dictated before him morning and evening."
Say: "The (Qur'an) was sent down by Him who knows the mystery (that is) in the heavens and the earth: verily He is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful."
And they say: "What sort of an apostle is this, who eats food, and walks through the streets? Why has not an angel been sent down to him to give admonition with him?
"Or (Why) has not a treasure been bestowed on him, or why has he (not) a garden for enjoyment?" The wicked say: "Ye follow none other than a man bewitched."
See what kinds of comparisons they make for thee! But they have gone astray, and never a way will they be able to find!
Blessed is He who, if that were His will, could give thee better (things) than those,- Gardens beneath which rivers flow; and He could give thee palaces (secure to dwell in).
Nay they deny the hour (of the judgment to come): but We have prepared a blazing fire for such as deny the hour:
When it sees them from a place fAr off, they will hear its fury and its ranging sigh.
And when they are cast, bound together into a constricted place therein, they will pLead for destruction there and then!
"This day plead not for a single destruction: plead for destruction oft- repeated!"
Say: "Is that best, or the eternal garden, promised to the righteous? for them, that is a reward as well as a goal (of attainment).
"For them there will be therein all that they wish for: they will dwell (there) for aye: A promise to be prayed for from thy Lord."
The day He will gather them together as well as those whom they worship besides God, He will ask: "Was it ye who let these My servants astray, or did they stray from the Path themselves?"
They will say: "Glory to Thee! not meet was it for us that we should take for protectors others besides Thee: But Thou didst bestow, on them and their fathers, good things (in life), until they forgot the Message: for they were a people (worthless and) lost."
(God will say): "Now have they proved you liars in what ye say: so ye cannot avert (your penalty) nor (get) help." And whoever among you does wrong, him shall We cause to taste of a grievous Penalty.
And the apostles whom We sent before thee were all (men) who ate food and walked through the streets: We have made some of you as a trial for others: will ye have patience? for God is One Who sees (all things).
Such as fear not the meeting with Us (for Judgment) say: "Why are not the angels sent down to us, or (why) do we not see our Lord?" Indeed they have an arrogant conceit of themselves, and mighty is the insolence of their impiety!
The Day they see the angels,- no joy will there be to the sinners that Day: The (angels) will say: "There is a barrier forbidden (to you) altogether!"
And We shall turn to whatever deeds they did (in this life), and We shall make such deeds as floating dust scattered about.
The Companions of the Garden will be well, that Day, in their abode, and have the fairest of places for repose.
The Day the heaven shall be rent asunder with clouds, and angels shall be sent down, descending (in ranks),-
That Day, the dominion as of right and truth, shall be (wholly) for (God) Most Merciful: it will be a Day of dire difficulty for the Misbelievers.
The Day that the wrong-doer will bite at his hands, he will say, "Oh! would that I had taken a (straight) path with the Apostle!
"Ah! woe is me! Would that I had never taken such a one for a friend!
"He did lead me astray from the Message (of God) after it had come to me! Ah! the Evil One is but a traitor to man!" Then the Apostle will say:
"O my Lord! Truly my people took this Qur'an for just foolish nonsense."
Thus have We made for every prophet an enemy among the sinners: but enough is thy Lord to guide and to help.
Those who reject Faith say: "Why is not the Qur'an revealed to him all at once? Thus (is it revealed), that We may strengthen thy heart thereby, and We have rehearsed it to thee in slow, well-arranged stages, gradually.
And no question do they bring to thee but We reveal to thee the truth and the best explanation (thereof).
Those who will be gathered to Hell (prone) on their faces,- they will be in an evil plight, and, as to Path, most astray.
(Before this,) We sent Moses The Book, and appointed his brother Aaron with him as minister;
And We command: "Go ye both, to the people who have rejected our Signs:" And those (people) We destroyed with utter destruction.
And the people of Noah,- when they rejected the apostles, We drowned them, and We made them as a Sign for mankind; and We have prepared for (all) wrong-doers a grievous Penalty;-
As also 'Ad and Thamud, and the Companions of the Rass, and many a generation between them.
To each one We set forth Parables and examples; and each one We broke to utter annihilation (for their sins).
And the (Unbelievers) must indeed have passed by the town on which was rained a shower of evil: did they not then see it (with their own eyes)? But they fear not the Resurrection.
When they see thee, they treat thee no otherwise than in mockery: "Is this the one whom God has sent as an apostle?"
"He indeed would well-nigh have misled us from our gods, had it not been that we were constant to them!" - Soon will they know, when they see the Penalty, who it is that is most misled in Path!
Seest thou such a one as taketh for his god his own passion (or impulse)? Couldst thou be a disposer of affairs for him?
Or thinkest thou that most of them listen or understand? They are only like cattle;- nay, they are worse astray in Path.
Hast thou not turned thy vision to thy Lord?- How He doth prolong the shadow! If He willed, He could make it stationary! then do We make the sun its guide;
Then We draw it in towards Ourselves,- a contraction by easy stages.
And He it is Who makes the Night as a Robe for you, and Sleep as Repose, and makes the Day (as it were) a Resurrection.
And He it is Who sends the winds as heralds of glad tidings, going before His mercy, and We send down pure water from the sky,-
That with it We may give life to a dead land, and slake the thirst of things We have created,- cattle and men in great numbers.
And We have distributed the (water) amongst them, in order that they may celebrate (our) praises, but most men are averse (to aught) but (rank) ingratitude.
Had it been Our Will, We could have sent a warner to every centre of population.
Therefore listen not to the Unbelievers, but strive against them with the utmost strenuousness, with the (Qur'an).
It is He Who has let free the two bodies of flowing water: One palatable and sweet, and the other salt and bitter; yet has He made a barrier between them, a partition that is forbidden to be passed.
It is He Who has created man from water: then has He established relationships of lineage and marriage: for thy Lord has power (over all things).
Yet do they worship, besides God, things that can neither profit them nor harm them: and the Misbeliever is a helper (of Evil), against his own Lord!
But thee We only sent to give glad tidings and admonition.
Say: "No reward do I ask of you for it but this: that each one who will may take a (straight) Path to his Lord."
And put thy trust in Him Who lives and dies not; and celebrate his praise; and enough is He to be acquainted with the faults of His servants;-
He Who created the heavens and the earth and all that is between, in six days, and is firmly established on the Throne (of Authority): God Most Gracious: ask thou, then, about Him of any acquainted (with such things).
When it is said to them, "Adore ye (God) Most Gracious!", they say, "And what is (God) Most Gracious? Shall we adore that which thou commandest us?" And it increases their flight (from the Truth).
Blessed is He Who made constellations in the skies, and placed therein a Lamp and a Moon giving light;
And it is He Who made the Night and the Day to follow each other: for such as have the will to celebrate His praises or to show their gratitude.
And the servants of (God) Most Gracious are those who walk on the earth in humility, and when the ignorant address them, they say, "Peace!";
Those who spend the night in adoration of their Lord prostrate and standing;
Those who say, "Our Lord! avert from us the Wrath of Hell, for its Wrath is indeed an affliction grievous,-
"Evil indeed is it as an abode, and as a place to rest in";
Those who, when they spend, are not extravagant and not niggardly, but hold a just (balance) between those (extremes);
Those who invoke not, with God, any other god, nor slay such life as God has made sacred except for just cause, nor commit fornication; - and any that does this (not only) meets punishment.
(But) the Penalty on the Day of Judgment will be doubled to him, and he will dwell therein in ignominy,-
Unless he repents, believes, and works righteous deeds, for God will change the evil of such persons into good, and God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful,
And whoever repents and does good has truly turned to God with an (acceptable) conversion;-
Those who witness no falsehood, and, if they pass by futility, they pass by it with honourable (avoidance);
Those who, when they are admonished with the Signs of their Lord, droop not down at them as if they were deaf or blind;
And those who pray, "Our Lord! Grant unto us wives and offspring who will be the comfort of our eyes, and give us (the grace) to lead the righteous."
Those are the ones who will be rewarded with the highest place in heaven, because of their patient constancy: therein shall they be met with salutations and peace,
Dwelling therein;- how beautiful an abode and place of rest!
Say (to the Rejecters): "My Lord is not uneasy because of you if ye call not on Him: But ye have indeed rejected (Him), and soon will come the inevitable (punishment)!"
Ta. Sin. Mim.
These are verses of the Book that makes (things) clear.
It may be thou frettest thy soul with grief, that they do not become Believers.
If (such) were Our Will, We could send down to them from the sky a Sign, to which they would bend their necks in humility.
But there comes not to them a newly-revealed Message from (God) Most Gracious, but they turn away therefrom.
They have indeed rejected (the Message): so they will know soon (enough) the truth of what they mocked at!
Do they not look at the earth,- how many noble things of all kinds We have produced therein?
Verily, in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily, thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
Behold, thy Lord called Moses: "Go to the people of iniquity,-
"The people of the Pharaoh: will they not fear God?"
He said: "O my Lord! I do fear that they will charge me with falsehood:
"My breast will be straitened. And my speech may not go (smoothly): so send unto Aaron.
"And (further), they have a charge of crime against me; and I fear they may slay me."
God said: "By no means! proceed then, both of you, with Our Signs; We are with you, and will listen (to your call).
"So go forth, both of you, to Pharaoh, and say: 'We have been sent by the Lord and Cherisher of the worlds;
"'Send thou with us the Children of Israel.'"
(Pharaoh) said: "Did we not cherish thee as a child among us, and didst thou not stay in our midst many years of thy life?
"And thou didst a deed of thine which (thou knowest) thou didst, and thou art an ungrateful (wretch)!"
Moses said: "I did it then, when I was in error.
"So I fled from you (all) when I feared you; but my Lord has (since) invested me with judgment (and wisdom) and appointed me as one of the apostles.
"And this is the favour with which thou dost reproach me,- that thou hast enslaved the Children of Israel!"
Pharaoh said: "And what is the 'Lord and Cherisher of the worlds'?"
(Moses) said: "The Lord and Cherisher of the heavens and the earth, and all between,- if ye want to be quite sure."
(Pharaoh) said to those around: "Did ye not listen (to what he says)?"
(Moses) said: "Your Lord and the Lord of your fathers from the beginning!"
(Pharaoh) said: "Truly your apostle who has been sent to you is a veritable madman!"
(Moses) said: "Lord of the East and the West, and all between! if ye only had sense!"
(Pharaoh) said: "If thou dost put forward any god other than me, I will certainly put thee in prison!"
(Moses) said: "Even if I showed you something clear (and) convincing?"
(Pharaoh) said: "Show it then, if thou tellest the truth!"
So (Moses) threw his rod, and behold, it was a serpent, plain (for all to see)!
And he drew out his hand, and behold, it was white to all beholders!
(Pharaoh) said to the Chiefs around him: "This is indeed a sorcerer well- versed:
"His plan is to get you out of your land by his sorcery; then what is it ye counsel?"
They said: "Keep him and his brother in suspense (for a while), and dispatch to the Cities heralds to collect-
"And bring up to thee all (our) sorcerers well-versed."
So the sorcerers were got together for the appointment of a day well-known,
And the people were told: "Are ye (now) assembled?-
"That we may follow the sorcerers (in religion) if they win?"
So when the sorcerers arrived, they said to Pharaoh: "Of course - shall we have a (suitable) reward if we win?
He said: "Yea, (and more),- for ye shall in that case be (raised to posts) nearest (to my person)."
Moses said to them: "Throw ye - that which ye are about to throw!"
So they threw their ropes and their rods, and said: "By the might of Pharaoh, it is we who will certainly win!"
Then Moses threw his rod, when, behold, it straightway swallows up all the falsehoods which they fake!
Then did the sorcerers fall down, prostrate in adoration,
Saying: "We believe in the Lord of the Worlds,
"The Lord of Moses and Aaron."
Said (Pharaoh): "Believe ye in Him before I give you permission? surely he is your leader, who has taught you sorcery! but soon shall ye know!
"Be sure I will cut off your hands and your feet on opposite sides, and I will cause you all to die on the cross!"
They said: "No matter! for us, we shall but return to our Lord!
"Only, our desire is that our Lord will forgive us our faults, that we may become foremost among the believers!"
By inspiration we told Moses: "Travel by night with my servants; for surely ye shall be pursued."
Then Pharaoh sent heralds to (all) the Cities,
(Saying): "These (Israelites) are but a small band,
"And they are raging furiously against us;
"But we are a multitude amply fore-warned."
So We expelled them from gardens, springs,
Treasures, and every kind of honourable position;
Thus it was, but We made the Children of Israel inheritors of such things.
So they pursued them at sunrise.
And when the two bodies saw each other, the people of Moses said: "We are sure to be overtaken."
(Moses) said: "By no means! my Lord is with me! Soon will He guide me!"
Then We told Moses by inspiration: "Strike the sea with thy rod." So it divided, and each separate part became like the huge, firm mass of a mountain.
And We made the other party approach thither.
We delivered Moses and all who were with him;
But We drowned the others.
Verily in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
And rehearse to them (something of) Abraham's story.
Behold, he said to his father and his people: "What worship ye?"
They said: "We worship idols, and we remain constantly in attendance on them."
He said: "Do they listen to you when ye call (on them), or do you good or harm?"
They said: "Nay, but we found our fathers doing thus (what we do)."
He said: "Do ye then see whom ye have been worshipping,-
"Ye and your fathers before you?-
"For they are enemies to me; not so the Lord and Cherisher of the Worlds;
"Who created me, and it is He Who guides me;
"Who gives me food and drink,
"And when I am ill, it is He Who cures me;
"Who will cause me to die, and then to life (again);
"And who, I hope, will forgive me my faults on the day of Judgment.
"O my Lord! bestow wisdom on me, and join me with the righteous;
"Grant me honourable mention on the tongue of truth among the latest (generations);
"Make me one of the inheritors of the Garden of Bliss;
"Forgive my father, for that he is among those astray;
"And let me not be in disgrace on the Day when (men) will be raised up;-
"The Day whereon neither wealth nor sons will avail,
"But only he (will prosper) that brings to God a sound heart;
"To the righteous, the Garden will be brought near,
"And to those straying in Evil, the Fire will be placed in full view;
"And it shall be said to them: 'Where are the (gods) ye worshipped-
"'Besides God? Can they help you or help themselves?'
"Then they will be thrown headlong into the (Fire),- they and those straying in Evil,
"And the whole hosts of Iblis together.
"They will say there in their mutual bickerings:
"'By God, we were truly in an error manifest,
"'When we held you as equals with the Lord of the Worlds;
"'And our seducers were only those who were steeped in guilt.
"'Now, then, we have none to intercede (for us),
"'Nor a single friend to feel (for us).
"'Now if we only had a chance of return we shall truly be of those who believe!'"
Verily in this is a Sign but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
The people of Noah rejected the apostles.
Behold, their brother Noah said to them: "Will ye not fear (God)?
"I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust:
"So fear God, and obey me.
"No reward do I ask of you for it: my reward is only from the Lord of the Worlds:
"So fear God, and obey me."
They said: "Shall we believe in thee when it is the meanest that follow thee?"
He said: "And what do I know as to what they do?
"Their account is only with my Lord, if ye could (but) understand.
"I am not one to drive away those who believe.
"I am sent only to warn plainly in public."
They said: "If thou desist not, O Noah! thou shalt be stoned (to death)."
He said: "O my Lord! truly my people have rejected me.
"Judge Thou, then, between me and them openly, and deliver me and those of the Believers who are with me."
So We delivered him and those with him, in the Ark filled (with all creatures).
Thereafter We drowned those who remained behind.
Verily in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
The 'Ad (people) rejected the apostles.
Behold, their brother Hud said to them: "Will ye not fear (God)?
"I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust:
"So fear God and obey me.
"No reward do I ask of you for it: my reward is only from the Lord of the Worlds.
"Do ye build a landmark on every high place to amuse yourselves?
"And do ye get for yourselves fine buildings in the hope of living therein (for ever)?
"And when ye exert your strong hand, do ye do it like men of absolute power?
"Now fear God, and obey me.
"Yea, fear Him Who has bestowed on you freely all that ye know.
"Freely has He bestowed on you cattle and sons,-
"And Gardens and Springs.
"Truly I fear for you the Penalty of a Great Day."
They said: "It is the same to us whether thou admonish us or be not among (our) admonishers!
"This is no other than a customary device of the ancients,
"And we are not the ones to receive Pains and Penalties!"
So they rejected him, and We destroyed them. Verily in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
The Thamud (people) rejected the apostles.
Behold, their brother Salih said to them: "Will you not fear (God)?
"I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust.
"So fear God, and obey me.
"No reward do I ask of you for it: my reward is only from the Lord of the Worlds.
"Will ye be left secure, in (the enjoyment of) all that ye have here?-
"Gardens and Springs,
"And corn-fields and date-palms with spathes near breaking (with the weight of fruit)?
"And ye carve houses out of (rocky) mountains with great skill.
"But fear God and obey me;
"And follow not the bidding of those who are extravagant,-
"Who make mischief in the land, and mend not (their ways)."
They said: "Thou art only one of those bewitched!
"Thou art no more than a mortal like us: then bring us a Sign, if thou tellest the truth!"
He said: "Here is a she-camel: she has a right of watering, and ye have a right of watering, (severally) on a day appointed.
"Touch her not with harm, lest the Penalty of a Great Day seize you."
But they ham-strung her: then did they become full of regrets.
But the Penalty seized them. Verily in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
The people of Lut rejected the apostles.
Behold, their brother Lut said to them: "Will ye not fear (God)?
"I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust.
"So fear God and obey me.
"No reward do I ask of you for it: my reward is only from the lord of the Worlds.
"Of all the creatures in the world, will ye approach males,
"And leave those whom God has created for you to be your mates? Nay, ye are a people transgressing (all limits)!"
They said: "If thou desist not, O Lut! thou wilt assuredly be cast out!"
He said: "I do detest your doings."
"O my Lord! deliver me and my family from such things as they do!"
So We delivered him and his family,- all
Except an old woman who lingered behind.
But the rest We destroyed utterly.
We rained down on them a shower (of brimstone): and evil was the shower on those who were admonished (but heeded not)!
Verily in this is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might Most Merciful.
The Companions of the Wood rejected the apostles.
Behold, Shu'aib said to them: "Will ye not fear (God)?
"I am to you an apostle worthy of all trust.
"So fear God and obey me.
"No reward do I ask of you for it: my reward is only from the Lord of the Worlds.
"Give just measure, and cause no loss (to others by fraud).
"And weigh with scales true and upright.
"And withhold not things justly due to men, nor do evil in the land, working mischief.
"And fear Him Who created you and (who created) the generations before (you)"
They said: "Thou art only one of those bewitched!
"Thou art no more than a mortal like us, and indeed we think thou art a liar!
"Now cause a piece of the sky to fall on us, if thou art truthful!"
He said: "My Lord knows best what ye do."
But they rejected him. Then the punishment of a day of overshadowing gloom seized them, and that was the Penalty of a Great Day.
Verily in that is a Sign: but most of them do not believe.
And verily thy Lord is He, the Exalted in Might, Most Merciful.
Verily this is a Revelation from the Lord of the Worlds:
With it came down the spirit of Faith and Truth-
To thy heart and mind, that thou mayest admonish.
In the perspicuous Arabic tongue.
Without doubt it is (announced) in the mystic Books of former peoples.
Is it not a Sign to them that the Learned of the Children of Israel knew it (as true)?
Had We revealed it to any of the non-Arabs,
And had he recited it to them, they would not have believed in it.
Thus have We caused it to enter the hearts of the sinners.
They will not believe in it until they see the grievous Penalty;
But the (Penalty) will come to them of a sudden, while they perceive it not;
Then they will say: "Shall we be respited?"
Do they then ask for Our Penalty to be hastened on?
Seest thou? If We do let them enjoy (this life) for a few years,
Yet there comes to them at length the (Punishment) which they were promised!
It will profit them not that they enjoyed (this life)!
Never did We destroy a population, but had its warners -
By way of reminder; and We never are unjust.
No evil ones have brought down this (Revelation):
It would neither suit them nor would they be able (to produce it).
Indeed they have been removed far from even (a chance of) hearing it.
So call not on any other god with God, or thou wilt be among those under the Penalty.
And admonish thy nearest kinsmen,
And lower thy wing to the Believers who follow thee.
Then if they disobey thee, say: "I am free (of responsibility) for what ye do!"
And put thy trust on the Exalted in Might, the Merciful,-
Who seeth thee standing forth (in prayer),
And thy movements among those who prostrate themselves,
For it is He Who heareth and knoweth all things.
Shall I inform you, (O people!), on whom it is that the evil ones descend?
They descend on every lying, wicked person,
(Into whose ears) they pour hearsay vanities, and most of them are liars.
And the Poets,- It is those straying in Evil, who follow them:
Seest thou not that they wander distracted in every valley?-
And that they say what they practise not?-
Except those who believe, work righteousness, engage much in the remembrance of God, and defend themselves only after they are unjustly attacked. And soon will the unjust assailants know what vicissitudes their affairs will take!
